Terms of Use
Privacy Policy
Accessibility Statement
Promotional Offer Terms
Zenni Reward Terms
Gift Card Terms
Refer a Friend
Return Policy Terms
Notice of Collection of Facial Information
California Job Applicant Privacy Policy
Extended Warranty
ZENNI OPTICAL PRIVACY POLICY
Last Updated: July 1, 2024
Zenni Optical, Inc. (“Zenni,” “Company,” “us,” “we,” or “our”) respects the privacy of individuals who provide us with personal information by visiting our website, using our apps, Services or purchasing our products. This Privacy Policy explains how we collect, use, share your personal information, the rights and choices you may have with respect to your personal information, and how to assert those rights.
By accessing, visiting or using our Services, you acknowledge this Privacy Policy and agree to our Terms of Use. If you are not comfortable with any part of this Policy or do not agree with the Terms of Use, please immediately discontinue access or use of our Services.
We may make changes to this Privacy Policy from time to time. Please review the “Last Updated” legend at the top of this page to determine when this Privacy Policy was last updated. Any changes to this Privacy Policy will become effective on the “Last Updated” date indicated above. If we make material changes to the Privacy Policy, then we will notify users by posting a notice on our website and/or via email prior to such use or by other means as required by law.
We may also provide “just-in-time” disclosure or additional information about our information collection, use, and sharing practices of specific Services. These notices may supplement or clarify our privacy practices or provide you with additional choices about how we process your personal information.
TABLE OF CONTENTS
APPLICABILITY AND SCOPE
PERSONAL
INFORMATION WE COLLECT
COOKIES
AND OTHER TRACKING TECHNOLOGIES
HOW
WE USE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
HOW
WE DISCLOSE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
THIRD
PARTY LINKS AND CONTENT
YOUR
CHOICES AND PRIVACY RIGHTS
CHILDREN
RETENTION
SECURITY
OF YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
INTERNATIONAL
TRANSFERS OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
NOTICE
OF FINANCIAL INCENTIVE
CALIFORNIA CONSUMERS PRIVACY NOTICE
ADDITIONAL
NOTICE TO INDIVIDUALS IN CANADA
[RESERVED]
HOW TO
CONTACT US
APPLICABILITY AND SCOPE
This Privacy
Policy applies to all personal information that we collect during any written,
electronic, or oral communications when you access and interact with our
website located at
www.zennioptical.com
, and any apps, Services, other websites,
pages, features or content we own or operate (collectively, the “Site(s)”), and
when you interact with other products or services that direct you to this
Policy (collectively, including the Sites, the “Services”).
This Privacy
Policy does not apply to the personal information we collect from employees,
contractors, job applicants, owners, directors or officers of Zenni. For
California residents, if you are applying for a job at Zenni, please see our
California
Job Applicant Privacy Policy
PERSONAL INFORMATION WE COLLECT
We collect certain personal information when you use our Services. Personal information is typically data that identifies an individual or relates to an identifiable individual. The definition of personal information (used interchangeably with “personal data”) depends on the applicable law based on your physical location. Only the definition that applies to your physical location will apply to you under this Policy. The personal information that we collect depends on your interactions with us, and the choices you make.
Information
You Voluntarily Provide.
The types of personal information that we or third-party service
providers who assist us (in providing, maintaining, and operating our Services)
may collect from you include:
Account
Registration.
We may collect information relating to the creation of an
account, such as your first and last name and email address.
Order Placement.
We may collect your personal information when you place an order through our Services, including, for example, your first and last name, delivery address, postal code, email address, phone number, payment account or credit card information. In order to process your order, we may collect your eye glass prescription data and certain measurements regarding your eyes, vision, vision health, and needs for eyeglasses. If you share any sensitive information through our Services, such as information about your medical or health conditions, we will handle, process and share this information in accordance with all applicable legal and regulatory requirements.
Payment Information.
When you place orders, purchase, send or reload gift cards, we may collect your payment card information, shipping and billing addresses, and phone numbers.
Customer Support.
When you engage with our support team and customer support providers, we may collect records, copies of your correspondence (including email addresses), or additional information you choose to share with us.
Zenni Frame Fit™, Virtual Try-On, and Pupillary Distance (“PD”) Measurement.
We may collect your photographs, videos, and/or facial scans if you choose to use the Zenni Frame Fit™, Virtual Try-On, and Pupillary Distance (“PD”) Measurement services. These services use the photographs, videos, and/or facial scans that you share with us, or allow us to capture through your devices to create a digital reconstruction of your face to show how you would look wearing a particular pair of glasses or to calculate a PD measurement, which is needed to make prescription eyeglass lenses. We utilize third-party service providers (i.e. Luna) and APIs (i.e. Apple TrueDepth API) to facilitate the visual image capture and calculation. We will seek your consent prior to such collection. For more details, please see our
Notice of Collection of Facial
Information
Newsletter Sign-ups.
You may choose to provide us your email address if you wish to receive promotional emails from us with news & exclusive offers.
Promotional Events.
If you choose to participate in a Promotion, we will collect and store the personal information you provide in connection with your participation in the Promotion, which may include, your name, email address, and/or phone number.
Web Forms.
We may collect your name, email, phone number, company name, job title, and other additional information you choose to provide when you inquire about our products, Services, programs, or would like to get in touch with us or our customer support providers for other matters. If you provide contact information, we may contact you to respond to your inquires, to learn about your level of interest in, or satisfaction with our Services.
Blog and Forums.
We offer publicly accessible blogs, posts and community
forums. If you post information on public areas of the Services that
information may be collected and used by Zenni, other users of the Services,
and the public generally.
We strongly recommend that you do not post
any information through the Services that allows strangers to identify or
locate you or that you otherwise do not want to share with the public.
To request the removal of your personal information from our blog or community forum, please contact us as described in the “How to Contact Us” section
Surveys.
We may provide you the opportunity to participate in surveys. If you participate, we may request certain personal information from you. Participation in these surveys is entirely voluntary. The requested information typically includes contact information (such as name and email address). We use this information to improve our services and product offerings.
Refer a Friend Program.
You may provide us with the names and email addresses of your friends and contacts if you use our “Refer a Friend” program on our Services. We will only use the email address you provide for your friend or contact for the limited purpose of sending the applicable invitation, link or communication.
Affiliate and Influencer Programs.
When you opt to participate our affiliate advertising or social media influencer programs, we may collect your name, email address, company information, address and any other personal information you provide.
Information We Automatically Collect.
To the extent permitted under the applicable law, we may automatically collect certain type of personal information about you when you use the Site or interact with the Services.
Usage Data.
When you browse our Sites, we automatically collect log data such as your web request, Internet Protocol (“IP”) address, browser type, domain names, referring and exit pages and URLs, pages viewed and the order of these page views, the date and time you access our servers, and other diagnostic data.
Device Information.
When you use your desktop or mobile devices to access our Services, we may be able to identify your device’s unique device identifier, MAC address, operating system, and your mobile device’s advertising ID.
Location Information.
When you use our Services, we may infer the generic physical location and geographic regions of your device from your Wi-Fi, Bluetooth and other device settings. For example, your IP address may indicate your general geographic region. Upon your permission, we may collect your mobile device’s precise geo-location to find the closest restaurants near you. You may choose not to share your location details with us by adjusting your mobile or desktop device’s location services settings. For instructions on changing the relevant settings, please contact your service provider or device manufacturer.
COOKIES AND OTHER TRACKING TECHNOLOGIES
We may automatically collect information from you when you use the Site using “cookies” and other similar technologies, such as web beacons (“Tracking Technologies”), to automatically collect information about you when you use the Site and to personalize your experience with our Services. We and third-party businesses on our behalf, may use Tracking Technologies to help us customize your experience and better manage content on our Sites,
Cookies are small amounts of data that are stored within your computer’s Internet browser and that are accessed and recorded by the websites that you visit so that they can recognize the same browser navigating online at a later time. Information that may be collected by cookies when you use the Site may include, without limitation: the pages you visit within the Site; the date and time of your visit to the Site; the amount of time you spend using the Site; the IP address used to connect your computer to the Internet; and/or your computer and connection information such as your browser type and version, operating system and platform.
Generally, we use first-party and third-party cookies for the following purposes: to make our Services function properly; to provide a secure browsing experience during your use of our Services; to collect passive information about your use of our Services; to measure how you interact with our marketing campaigns; to help us improve our Services; and to remember your preferences for your convenience.
We may place cookies from third-party service providers who may use information about your visits to other websites to target advertisements for products and services available from us. We do not control the types of information collected and stored by these third-party cookies. You should check the third-party's website for more information on how they use cookies. We use the following types of cookies on our Services:
Strictly Necessary Cookies.
These cookies are essential because they enable you to use our Services. For example, strictly necessary cookies allow you to access secure areas on our Services. Without these cookies, some services cannot be provided. These cookies do not gather information about you for marketing purposes. This category of cookies is essential for our Services to work and they cannot be disabled.
Functional Cookies.
We use functional cookies to remember your choices so we can tailor our Services to provide you with enhanced features and personalized content. For example, these cookies can be used to remember your name or preferences on our Services. We do not use functional cookies to target you with online marketing. While these cookies can be disabled, this may result in less functionality during your use of our Services.
Performance or Analytic Cookies.
We may work with third-party analytics services to help us understand how the Site is being used, such as tracking the frequency and duration of use of the Site. We may use Google Analytics, a web analytics service provided by Google, Inc. (“Google”), to collect information about your use of the Site. Google and these analytics services may use cookies to collect information about the content you view, what websites you visit immediately prior to and after visiting the Site, and your system information and geographic information. The information generated by these cookies about your use of the Site will be transmitted to and stored by the applicable analytics services. The information collected by these analytics services allows us to analyze your use of the Site.
Advertising or Targeting Cookies.
These cookies are used to make advertising messages more relevant to you. They perform functions like preventing the same ad from continuously reappearing, ensuring that ads are properly displayed for advertisers, and in some cases selecting advertisements that are based on your interests. Our third-party advertising partners may use these cookies to build a profile of your interests and deliver relevant advertising on other sites. You may disable the use of these cookies as set forth below.
HOW WE USE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
We use your personal information for the following business and commercial purposes, unless restricted by applicable law:
To Fulfill Orders and To Provide Our Services.
We use personal information we gather through the Services to provide you with our Services that you request, such as creating and managing user accounts, processing your purchase orders, and/or renewing your prescriptions. If you choose to use our Virtual Try-On and/or PD Measurement services, we use the photographs, videos, and or facial scans you provide through the Services to create a digital reconstruction of your face. With this reconstruction, we can show you how a pair of glasses would look on your face with the Virtual Try-On tool. Similarly, with the PD Measurement tool, we can determine your pupillary distance, which is needed to produce prescription eyeglass lenses.
To Provide You with Service-Related Communications.
We may use your personal information to communicate with you. We may send you administrative or account-related information to keep you updated about your account and the Services. Such communications may include information about privacy policy and terms updates, security updates, tips or other relevant transaction-related information. Service-related communications are not promotional in nature. You are not able to unsubscribe from such communications, otherwise you may miss important developments relating to your account or the Services. Additionally, when placing on order for glasses through the Services, you will have the ability to opt-in to receive “Renewal Reminders” from us. If you opt-in to receive Renewal Reminders, we will use the email address you have provided to us to send you reminders that your prescription (Rx) may require renewal.
To Provide Customer Support or Respond to You.
We collect any information that you provide to us when you contact us. Without your personal information, we cannot respond to you or ensure your continued use and satisfaction of the Services.
To Provide Marketing Communications.
If you have voluntarily provided your email
address, phone number or other electronic addresses to us when subscribing to
our marketing communications, we may email you about products, services, and
promotions that we believe may be of interest to you. When you no longer wish
to receive these marketing messages from us, you can opt out at any time by
following the instructions contained in each email you receive from us or
contacting us via the methods specified in the “
How to Contact Us
”
section below.
To Research and Develop of Our Services.
We may process your personal information and
derive analytical and statistical data to better understand the way you use and
interact with our Services. For instance, analyzing where, on which types of
devices and how our Site is used, how many visitors we receive, and where they
click on the Site may help us improve our existing Services and to build new
Services. Please see our
Cookies and Other Similar Tracking Technologies
section for more information.
To Personalize Your Experience.
We may process your information to personalize your experience. By personalization, we enable you to interact with our Services more easily across platforms and devices.
To Facilitate Corporate Acquisitions, Mergers and Transactions.
We may process any information regarding your account and your use of our Services as is necessary in the context of corporate acquisitions, mergers or other corporate transactions.
To Enforce Compliance with Our Terms, Agreements and Policies.
When you access or use our Services, you are bound to our Terms. We may process your personal information when actively monitoring, investigating, preventing and mitigating any alleged or actual prohibited, illicit or illegal activities on our Services. We may also process your personal information to investigate, prevent or mitigate violations of our internal terms, agreements or policies; and enforce our agreements with third parties.
To Ensure the Security of the Services.
We may process your personal information to combat spam, malware, malicious activities or security risks; improve and enforce our security measures; and to monitor and verify your identity so that unauthorized users do not gain access to your information.
To Maintain Legal and Regulatory Compliance.
Our Services are subject to certain laws and regulations which may require us to process your personal information. For example, we process your personal information to pay our taxes, to fulfill our business obligations, or as necessary to manage risk as required under applicable law, or to respond to requests by judicial process or governmental agencies.
For Promotional Events.
From time to time, we may offer you an opportunity to participate in promotions and/or sweepstakes (collectively, “Promotions”) via the Site or through a third-party platform. If you choose to participate in a Promotion, we will collect and store the personal information you provide in connection with your participation in the Promotion, including, but not limited to, your name, email address, , and/or phone number. We may provide “just-in-time” disclosure or additional information about our information collection, use and sharing practices of specific Promotions. Information we collect in connection with a Promotion will be used to administer the Promotion, such as by notifying winners and distributing prizes. As permitted by applicable law, your personal information may also be used by Zenni or the Promotion sponsor for marketing purposes. Acceptance of a prize may require you (unless prohibited by law) to allow us to post publicly some of your information via the Services, such as on a winner's page.
With Your Consent.
For any other purpose disclosed to you prior to you providing us your personal information or which is reasonably necessary to provide the services or other related services requested, with your permission or upon your direction.
HOW WE DISCLOSE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
We may disclose your personal information as described below:
Within Our Corporate Organization.
We may share some or all of your personal information with our parent company, subsidiaries and corporate affiliates, joint ventures, or other companies under common control with us. If you opt-in to receive marketing communications from third parties, we may permit these entities to use your information for their own marketing purposes. If you would like us to stop providing your information to our affiliates for their own marketing purposes, you may opt-out by emailing us at
privacy@zennioptical.com
.
With Our Service Providers and Business Partners.
We may disclose your personal information to our contractors, affiliates, distributors and suppliers (“Service Providers”) who provide certain services to us or on our behalf, such as fulfilling orders you place through the Services, processing payments, operating and supporting the Services, including the Zenni Frame Fit™ service, analyzing data, or performing marketing or consulting services. These Service Providers will only have access to the information needed to perform these limited functions on our behalf.
If you choose to use our Virtual Try-On and/or PD Measurement services, your photographs, videos, and/or facial scans will be shared with Luna, whose technology powers these services. We and Luna will only use the data you share with us as part of the Virtual Try-On and/or PD Measurement services to show you how you may look in eyewear frames or to measure your pupillary distance, respectively. We require Luna to store your information for no longer than necessary as to provide you these services and at most, no more than three years. We and Luna will not sell the information you share with us when using the Virtual Try-On and PD Measurement services. For more information about the personal information Luna collects and processes to help Zenni provide the Virtual Try-On and PD Measurement services, please see Luna’s Privacy Policy, available at:
https://luna.io/trust/privacy/.
Response to Subpoenas or Court Orders or to Protect Rights and to Comply with Our Policies.
We may disclose personal information to government authorities or third parties if: (a) required to do so by law, or in response to law enforcement requests and legal processes, such as a subpoena or court order; (b) comply with requests from auditors, examiners or other regulators; (c) we believe in our sole discretion that disclosure is reasonably necessary to protect against fraud, to protect the property or other rights of us or other users, third parties or the public at large; or (c) we believe that you have abused the Site by using it to attack other systems or to gain unauthorized access to any other system, to engage in spamming or otherwise to violate applicable laws. You should be aware that, following disclosure to any third party, your information may be accessible by others to the extent permitted or required by applicable law.
During Business Transfers; Bankruptcy.
In the event of a merger, acquisition, bankruptcy or other sale of all or a portion of our assets, any personal information owned or controlled by us may be one of the assets transferred to third parties. We reserve the right, as part of this type of transaction, to transfer or assign personal information and other information we have collected from users of the Services to buyers, service providers, advisors, potential transactional partners or other third parties in connection with the advisors, potential transactional partners or other third parties of a corporate transaction. Other than to the extent ordered by a bankruptcy or other court, the use and disclosure of all transferred user information will be subject to this Privacy Policy. However, any information you submit or that is collected after this type of transfer may be subject to a new privacy policy adopted by the successor entity.
With Marketing Partners.
If you affirmatively opt-in to receive marketing communications from third parties, we may, from time to time, share personal information you provide to us with selected third-party marketing partners that we believe offer products or services that may be of interest to you. If you would like us to stop providing your information to our third-party marketing partners, you may opt-out by emailing us at
privacy@zennioptical.com
To learn more about your choices and rights, please review the “
Your Choices and Rights
” section below.
With Your Consent.
We may share your personal information with other companies if you give us permission or direct us to share your information.
THIRD PARTY LINKS AND CONTENT
The Services may include links to other third party websites and content from third party businesses. Zenni does not have access to or control over these third parties or the cookies, web beacons or other technology that these third parties may use. We are not responsible for the privacy practices of these third parties or the content on any third-party website. You are encouraged to review the privacy policies of the different websites you visit and of the advertisers whose ads you may choose to click while on our Services (see section 2 above for additional information about online advertising).
Social Media Services.
The Services may include links to social media services or their features, such as sharing buttons, that will enable you to post comments, stories, reviews or other information on applicable social media websites. Your use of these social media services may result in the collection or sharing of your personal information by these social media services. We encourage you to review the privacy policies and settings on the social media services with which you interact to make sure you understand the information that may be collected, used, and shared by those social media services.
Third-Party Review Services.
You may also provide information directly to third parties through the Services if you elect to use the third-party review service that we offer through the Services, Reseller Ratings by Answers. You are not required to use the Reseller Ratings by Answers service, but you may elect to do so by opting in and providing your email address. A copy of the Reseller Ratings by Answers privacy policy is located at
https://www.resellerratings.com/terms#privacypolicy
. When you are asked by Reseller Ratings by Answers to share your thoughts about one of our products, your review may be posted on the Services as well as on sites that share reviews with the shopping community such as Google and others.
Payment Processors.
All payments made through the Services are processed by our third-party providers. All information collected by these third-party providers for purposes of processing your payments is not available to us, unless you have otherwise provided this information to us in connection with your use of the Services.
Third-Party Promotions.
In some instances, a third-party advertiser or sponsor may operate or host a Promotion on or through our Services, and collect your information. In those cases, where we are not the sponsor or operator of the Promotion, we have no control over the information collected and, before participating, you should review the official rules as well as the advertiser's or the sponsor's privacy policy applicable to the Promotion. All of our Promotions are intended for people who are the age of majority in their respective state, province or country unless otherwise expressly stated.
YOUR CHOICES AND PRIVACY RIGHTS
A. Your Choices
We offer you certain choices about how we communicate with you and manage what personal information we collect from you.
Correct or Update Your Information
If you have created a user account through the Services, you will have the ability to access, update and correct the personal information you have provided in connection with your account by logging into your account through the Services.
Marketing
Communications
We offer you certain choices about how we communicate with you. To update your preferences, limit the communications you receive from us, please contact us as specified in the “How to Contact Us” section at the end of this Privacy Policy. Where provided by law, you may withdraw your consent previously provided to us, and we will apply your preferences going forward. You can also choose not to receive marketing communications from us by clicking on the unsubscribe link in our marketing content.
Managing
Cookies
You have the right to decide whether to accept cookies. If you do not want us to deploy cookies in your browser, you may exercise your preference by clicking “Your Privacy Rights” in the footer, by clicking here or by modifying your web browser setting to refuse some or all cookies or to notify you and ask for your permission when a website tries to set a cookie. If you want to learn how to modify your browser settings, please use the “Help,” “Tools” or “Edit” menu in your browser or review the instructions provided by the following browsers:
Microsoft Edge,
Google Chrome,
Mozilla Firefox,
Safari Desktop,
Safari Mobile;
and Android
browser. If you block or delete technical and/or function cookies used by our Sites, the Sites may become impossible to browse, certain services or functions of the Sites may become unavailable or other malfunctions may occur. In this case, you may have to modify or manually enter some information or preferences every time you visit the Sites.
Analytics. We may use third-party service providers to monitor and analyze the use of our Sites, such as Google Analytics. Google Analytics is a web analytics service offered by Google LLC (“Google”) that tracks and reports website traffic. For more information on the privacy practices of Google, please visit the Google Privacy & Terms web page:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en
. Google Analytics Opt-out Browser Add-on provides visitors with the ability to prevent their data from being collected and used by Google Analytics, available at:
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
Managing Interest-Based Advertising
Website Browser. Many advertising companies that collect information for interest-based advertising are members of the Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) or the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI), both of which maintain websites where people can opt out of interest-based advertising from their members. To opt out of website interest-based advertising provided by each organization’s respective participating companies, visit the DAA’s opt-out portal available at
http://optout.aboutads.info/
, or visit the NAI’s opt-out portal available at
http://optout.networkadvertising.org/?c=1
. Residents of the European Union may opt-out of online behavioral advertising served by the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance’s participating member organizations by visiting
https://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
.
Mobile Application. When you use our mobile application, we or our third-party marketing partners may use one or more of several different identifiers for your mobile device, including Apple Identifier For Advertising (IDFA) or Android Advertising ID (AAID), to target and deliver ads to you in our app or other apps. This means that your device identifier may be accessed by third-party ad networks and used to (a) help manage the number and types of ads you see; (b) track the source of installs related to ads seen in other apps; and (c) identify your interests and behavior and target advertising to you based on those interests and behavior.
Apple requires app developers to ask for permission before they can track your activity across apps or websites they do not own in order to target advertising to you, measure your actions due to advertising, or to share your information with data brokers. If you previously gave our mobile app permission to track, you can tell our app to stop tracking your activity. On iOS or iPadOS, go to Settings, tap on our app, then tap to turn off Allow Tracking. You can also reset your IDFA from your mobile device’s settings page, which will prevent continued use of existing behavioral data tied to your previous IDFA.
If you have an Android device, and are running Android 12 or above, you can delete your AAID permanently by opening Settings, navigating to Privacy > Ads, tapping “Delete advertising ID,” then tapping it again on the next page to confirm. This will prevent any app on your phone from accessing it in the future. Please note that if you do so, you will still see advertisements, but they will not be tailored to your inferred interests.
You may also
access industry-provided opt-out tools, although they are not tailored to our
mobile applications. For instance, to opt-out of data collection by the
Digital Advertising Alliance’s participating member companies for
interest-based advertising across mobile applications, download the DAA’s App
Choices mobile application opt-out offering at
https://youradchoices.com/appchoices
.
B. Your Privacy Rights
Depending on applicable law where you reside or are located, you may be able to assert certain rights identified below with respect to your personal information. If any of the rights listed below are not provided to you under the law that governs the processing of your personal information, we have absolute discretion in providing you with those rights. Please refer to the “
What Rights Apply
” section to determine the rights you have in the jurisdiction you reside.
Please note, your rights in relation to your personal information are not absolute. Depending upon the applicable law, access to your rights under the applicable law may be denied: (i) when denial of the request is required or authorized by law; (ii) when granting the request would have a negative impact on another's privacy; (iii) to protect our rights and properties; (iv) where the request is frivolous or vexatious, or for other reasons.
Right to Know/Access.
You may have the right to obtain a copy, or a list of categories of the personal information that we hold about you, as well as other supplementary information, such as the purposes of processing, and the entities to whom we disclose your personal information.
Right to Correct/Rectification.
You may have the right to correct any of your personal information in our records and systems. You may request us to rectify, correct or update any of your personal information held by us that is inaccurate.
Right to Delete/Erasure.
Under certain circumstances, you may have the right to request that we delete the personal information that we hold about you. This right is not absolute, and we may refuse your right to delete if it is reasonably necessary for us to provide a service requested by you; to perform a contract between us; to maintain functionality and ensure security of our systems; to enable solely expected internal uses of your personal information; to exercise a right provided by law; to comply with a legal obligation, or if there are compelling legitimate grounds for keeping your personal information.
Right to Portability.
Under certain circumstances, you may have the right to receive personal information we hold about you in a structured, commonly used, and machine-readable format so that you can provide that personal information to another entity.
Right Against Discrimination.
You have the right not to be discriminated against for exercising any of the rights described in this section. We will not discriminate against you for exercising your privacy rights.
Right to Object to Automated Decision-Making.
You may have the right not to be subject to a decision that is based solely on automated processing (where a decision is taken about you using an electronic system without human involvement) which significantly impacts your rights. No decision will be made by us about you solely on the basis of automated decision making which has a significant impact on you.
Right Not to Provide Consent or to Withdraw Consent.
We may seek to rely on your consent in order to process certain personal information. Where we do so, you have the right not to provide your consent or to withdraw your consent at any time. This does not affect the lawfulness of the processing based on consent before its withdrawal.
Right to Restriction.
You may have the right to request that we restrict our processing of your personal information in certain circumstance. For instance, this right is available if you contest the accuracy of the personal information, or you objected to our processing.
Right to Object to Processing.
You may have the right to object to our processing of your personal information at any time and as permitted by applicable law if we process your personal information on the legal bases of: consent, or legitimate interests. However, we may continue to process your personal information if it is necessary for the defense of legal claims, or for any other exceptions permitted by applicable law.
Right to Appeal.
You may have the right to appeal if we refuse to take action on your rights request. Instructions on how to appeal will be provided to you upon such a denial, but in any event, such instructions will be substantially similar to those provided below for submitting requests.
To determine which rights you have, please refer to the table below that references the rights as described above. U.S. States not listed either do not have a law providing such rights, or it does not apply to our operations.
Jurisdiction
Applicable Rights
California
Residents
(a) Right to Know/Access; (b) Right to Correct/Rectification;
(c) Right to Delete/Erasure; (d) Right to Portability; (e) Right Against
Discrimination; and (f) Right to Opt-Out of Automated Decision-making or
Profiling (upon issuance of regulations by the California Privacy Protection
Agency)
Virginia, Colorado & Connecticut, Oregon & Texas Residents
(a)
Right to Know/Access; (b) Right to Correct/Rectification; (c) Right to
Delete/Erasure; (d) Right to Portability; (e) Right to Opt-Out of Automated
Decision-making or Profiling; and (j) Right to Appeal; and (g) Right Against Discrimination
Utah
Residents
(
a)
Right to Know/ Access; (c) Right to Delete/Erase; (d) Right to
Portability; and (e) Right Against Discrimination
European Economic Area,  United Kingdom and 
Switzerland (
for individuals located in these jurisdictions when their
personal information is collected
)
(a)
Right to Know/Access; (b) Right to Correct/Rectification; (c) Right to
Delete/Erasure; (d) Right to Portability; (f) Right to Opt-Out of Automated
Decision-making or Profiling; (g) Right Not to Provide Consent or to Withdraw
Consent; (h) Right to Restriction; and (i) Right to Object to Processing
Submitting a Request to Exercise Your Privacy Rights
To assert your privacy rights noted above, please email
privacy@zennioptical.com
and indicate which rights you would like to exercise
. Please note California and Texas residents may do so up to twice per year per customer, and Colorado and Oregon residents may do so once per year per customer. We may charge a reasonable fee for multiple requests in the same 12-month period, as permitted by law.
To protect your privacy, we must be able to verify your identity to confirm that the request came from you before we can process your request to exercise any of the privacy rights that you may be entitled to under the applicable law. We may contact you by phone or e-mail to verify your request. Depending on your request, we will ask for information such as your name, an e-mail address that you have used with Zenni, or a phone number you have used with Zenni. For certain requests, we may also ask you to provide details about the most recent purchase you made online.
Residents of California, Colorado, and Connecticut may designate an authorized agent to submit a request on your behalf to access or delete your personal information. To do so, you must: (1) provide that authorized agent written and signed permission to submit such request; and (2) verify your own identity directly with us. Please note, we may deny a request from an authorized agent that does not submit proof that they have been authorized by you to act on your behalf.
C. Your Opt-Out Rights
If you reside in California, Colorado, Connecticut, Virginia, Oregon or Texas you may have the right to opt-out of certain types of processing for your personal information.
Right to Opt Out of Sale.
You may have the right to opt-out of the sale of your personal information. We generally do not sell your personal information for profit, but like many businesses, we use cookies, pixels, and similar technology on our Sites, and we share certain personal information, such as your IP address or device identifiers, to third-party advertisers in order to improve your user experience and to optimize our marketing activities. Under the broad definition of “sell” contained in some jurisdiction’s privacy laws, this could be considered a sale.
Right to Opt Out of Targeted Advertising.
You may have the right to opt-out of the sharing of your personal information to third parties for behavioral or cross-contextual advertising purposes. Like many websites, we use cookies, pixels, and similar technology, and we share certain information, such as your IP address or device identifiers, to certain third-party advertisers in order to improve your user experience and to optimize our marketing activities. You have the right to direct us not to share or use your personal information for targeted advertising purposes.
To exercise your right to opt-out of sales and targeted advertising, please click the “Your Privacy Rights” link in the website footer and switch off the toggle for “Opt Out of Sale/Sharing/Targeted Advertising.” Please note that you may still receive generalized ads after opting out of targeted advertising.
If you are a resident of California or Colorado, you may also opt-out of sharing and sales by using an opt-out preference signal. The Global Privacy Control signal is currently the only opt-out preference signal we can recognize. You can visit the Global Privacy Control official site at
https://globalprivacycontrol.org/#about
to learn how to configure your device to send such signals. We will honor and process the opt-out preference signal in a frictionless manner. Please note that the opt-out choice will only apply to your use of our Sites through the current browser or device you are using and only so long as that browser’s cookies are not erased. You will need to submit a separate opt-out of sharing request on each device and browser you use to visit our Sites to completely opt-out using this method. Please note that you may still receive generalized ads after opting out of targeted advertising.
Residents of Oregon may designate an authorized agent to submit a request to opt-out of sale and/or targeted advertising.
CHILDREN
Our Site is not intended for children under age 16. We do not knowingly collect or distribute personal information that we collect directly from children under the age of 16. When parents or legal guardians of children under 16 place orders for children’s glasses through our Services, we may collect prescription information for children under the age of 16, and other information as necessary to deliver Zenni products. We will use this prescription information and related information collected in the course of fulfilling that order only for fulfilling the applicable order, and only within the limits permitted by applicable law.
If you are a parent or guardian and wish to review information collected from your child, or have that information modified or deleted, you may contact us via the method identified in the “
How to Contact Us
” section below. If we become aware that a child under 16 has provided us with personal information, we will terminate the user’s access to our Service and take steps to delete such information from our systems, unless we have a legal obligation to keep it.
RETENTION
We will retain your information for as long as your account is active, as needed to provide you Services or for other purposes stated in this Policy. We will cease to retain your personal information or remove the means by which the personal information can be associated with you as soon as it is reasonable to assume that such retention no longer serves the purpose for which the personal information was collected and is no longer necessary for legal or business purposes. If you wish to cancel your account or request that we no longer use your information to provide you services, we may still retain and use your information as necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements.
SECURITY OF YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
We implement security measures intended to protect against the loss, misuse and alteration of the personal information under our control. Please be aware that no data transmission over the Internet can be guaranteed to be 100% secure. We cannot guarantee the security of our databases or the databases of the third parties with which we may share such information, nor can we guarantee that the information you supply will not be intercepted while being transmitted over the internet. Please remember that you play a valuable part in security as well. If you feel that the security of any account you might have with us has been compromised, you should contact us immediately as described in the “How to Contact Us” section.
INTERNATIONAL TRANSFERS OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
We are an online retailer of prescription glasses, based in the United States. Our business operates on a global scale. When you access or submit information to us, your personal information may be transferred to, processed, maintained, and used on computers, servers and systems located where the data protection laws may not be as protective as those in your jurisdiction. In addition, we may transfer your personal information to our service providers located in China to fulfill orders you place through the Services. We will take appropriate contractual or other steps to protect the relevant personal information in accordance with applicable laws.
NOTICE OF FINANCIAL INCENTIVE
We offer our customers loyalty programs (
Zenni Loyalty Rewards Program
,
Military, First Responder & Medical or Nurse Personnel
,
Student
and
Teacher Discount
Programs, and
Refer a Friend Program
) that provides certain perks, such as rewards and special promotions. We may also provide other programs, such as sweepstakes, contests, newsletters, or other similar promotional campaigns (collectively, the “Programs”). When you sign up for one of our Programs, we will ask you to provide your name and contact information (such as email address and/or telephone number). Because our Programs involve the collection of personal information, they might be interpreted as a “financial incentive” program under California law. The value of your personal information to us is related to the value of the free or discounted products or services, or other benefits that you obtain or that are provided as part of the Program.
You may withdraw from participating in a Program at any time by contacting us using the designated method set forth in the applicable Program terms. Visit the terms and conditions page of each Program to view full details, including how to join. To learn more, please check out our
FAQ page
for the loyalty programs, and the Terms and Conditions for each Program, available through the navigation bar on
Terms and Conditions | Zenni Optical
.
CALIFORNIA CONSUMERS PRIVACY NOTICE
If you are a California resident, this section applies to you in addition to the rest of this Privacy Policy. The California Consumer Privacy Act, as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act (“CCPA”) requires us to disclose the following additional information related to our privacy practices.
Categories of Personal Information Collected, Used, and Disclosed
In the preceding 12 months, depending how you interact with our Services, we may have collect the following categories of personal information (as defined under Cal. Civ. Code §1798.140(v)(1)):
Identifiers
such as a name, address, unique personal identifier, email, phone number, your device’s IP address, software, and identification numbers associated with your devices;
Commercial information
such as records of products or services purchased, obtained, or considered by you, transaction records, and payment information;
Internet or other electronic information
regarding you browsing history, search history, the webpage visited before you came to our Site, length of visit and number of page views, click-stream data, locale preferences, your mobile carrier, date and time stamps associated with transactions, and system configuration information;
Geolocation data
, to the extent you have configured your device to permit us to collect such information;
Audio or Visual information
, such as audio recordings of your voice to the extent you call us, as permitted under applicable law; and
Inferences drawn from any of the information listed above
, such as your shopping preferences, characteristics, and behavior.
We generally do not collect protected classifications about our users, biometric information, professional or employment-related information, or education-related information. For more information about the Personal Information we collect and how we collect it, please refer to
Section 2
above.
Purposes for Collecting and Using Categories of Personal Information
We collect and use your personal information for the following business purposes:
Performing services, including maintaining or servicing accounts, providing customer service, processing or fulfilling orders and transactions, verifying customer information, processing payments, providing financing, providing analytics services, providing storage or similar services;
Providing advertising and marketing services;
Auditing related to counting ad impressions to unique visitors, verifying positioning and quality of ad impressions, and auditing compliance;
Helping to ensure security and integrity;
Debugging to identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality;
Short-term, transient use, such as non-personalized advertising shown as part of your current interaction with us;
Undertaking internal research for technological development and demonstration; and
Undertaking activities to verify or maintain the quality or safety of a service or device that is owned, manufactured, manufactured for, or controlled by us, and to improve, upgrade, or enhance the service or device that is owned, manufactured, manufactured for, or controlled by us.
For more information about the purpose of collecting and using the categories of personal information listed above, please refer to
Section 4
above.
Sale or Share of Personal Information
We may share or sell your identifiers, device information, demographic information and geolocation to advertising networks, and our business partners. To exercise your right to opt-out of sales and targeted advertising, please click the “Your Privacy Rights” link in the website footer or here, and switch off the toggle for “Opt Out of Sale/Sharing/Targeted Advertising.” Please note that you may still receive generalized ads after opting out of targeted advertising.
You may also opt-out of sharing and sales by using an opt-out preference signal. The Global Privacy Control signal is currently the only opt-out preference signal we can recognize. You can visit the Global Privacy Control official site at https://globalprivacycontrol.org/#about to learn how to configure your device to send such signals.
Zenni does not knowingly sell or share (for cross-context behavioral advertising) the personal information of consumers under 16 years of age.
Retention of Personal Information
We retain your information for as long as your account is active, as needed to provide you Services or for other purposes stated in this Policy, or as required or permitted by applicable law. For more information about the criteria for retaining personal information listed above, please refer to
Section 9
above.
Your Right to Limit Use of Sensitive Information
If you are a California resident, to the extent your sensitive personal information (as that term is defined under the CCPA) is used to infer characteristic about you, you have the right to direct us to stop such processing of your sensitive personal information for such purposes. We may process your precise geolocation for notification delivery purposes from time to time, and you may limit this type of processing by adjusting Zenni App’s access to your location data from the mobile device level.
Shine the Light
In addition to the CCPA, California's "Shine the Light" law, Civil Code section 1798.83, requires certain businesses to respond to requests from California residents asking about the businesses' practices related to disclosing personal information to third parties for the third parties' direct marketing purposes. Alternately, such businesses may have in place a policy not to disclose personal information of customers to third parties for the third parties' direct marketing purposes if a California customer has exercised an option to opt out of such information sharing. We have such a policy. If you want to opt out of any such sharing of your information, please contact us using the information below.
Do Not Track
Your browser may allow you to adjust your browser settings so that “do not track” requests are sent to the websites that you visit. However, since uniform standards for “DNT" signals have not been adopted, we do not disable tracking technology that may be active on the Sites in response to any “do not track” requests that we receive from your browser.
ADDITIONAL NOTICE TO INDIVIDUALS IN CANADA
This Section provides additional information to individuals located in Canada at the time their personal information is collected by Zenni. You may request details about our privacy practices, access or correct your personal information, or make a complaint by contacting our privacy officer in writing at: Zenni Optical, Inc., 448 Ignacio Boulevard, Suite 332, Novato, CA 94949 USA, or at
privacy@zennioptical.com
.
If you are not satisfied with our response to your inquiry, you may contact the Office of the Privacy Commissioner of Canada: 1-800-282-1376 (toll-free) or priv.gc.ca
[RESERVED]
HOW TO CONTACT US
If you have any questions or complaints regarding this Privacy Policy, please contact us by sending an email to
privacy@zennioptical.com
. We will investigate your question, respond to your inquiry, and attempt to resolve any concerns regarding your privacy question. If we need, or are required, to contact you concerning any event that involves your personal information we may do so by e-mail, telephone, or mail. For individuals in Canada, please see Section 14 for additional contact information. For individual in the European Countries, please see Section 15 for additional contact information.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.zennioptical.com/CA-Job-Applicant:
You're currently shopping our U.S. site.
You're currently shopping our United States site.
To make a purchase on our Canadian site, you'll need to create a separate account.
français-Fn
English-En
Save changes
Enable
Accessibility
×
20% Off
with Code
LENS20
:
Blokz®
,
EyeQLenz™
&
Transitions®
.
Terms of Use
Privacy Policy
Accessibility Statement
Promotional Offer Terms
Zenni Reward Terms
Gift Card Terms
Refer a Friend
Return Policy Terms
Notice of Collection of Facial Information
California Job Applicant Privacy Policy
Extended Warranty
Sub-policy 1
https://luna.io/trust/privacy/:
Skip to content
1. Data Collection & Processing
2. Data Uses
3. Information of a Biometric Nature
4. Data Location
5. Data Retention
6. Data Disclosure
7. Cookies & Data Collection Technologies
8. Communications
9. Data Security
10. Data Subject Rights
11. Data Controller/Processor
12. Additional Notices
Luna Solutions Privacy Policy
Effective as of February 2023
Luna Solutions, LLC and its affiliates Ditto Technologies Inc. and 6over6 Vision Ltd. (each a
“Luna Entity”
and collectively the
“Luna Entities”, “we”, “us”,
or
“our”
) offer an integrated suite of technologies and services to individuals (“
End-Users
”), eyewear retailers, brands and doctors all around the world (the “
Customer(s)
”).
Each of the services and product listed in the chart below (“
Solutions
”) is provided through a different Luna Entity. Depending on the Solution you use, the data controller (or processor, as applicable) of your personal data will be the following entity:
The Luna Entity
Solution(s)
Address
Ditto Technologies Inc.
Virtual Try-On
261 W Data Drive, Draper, Utah 84020
6over6 Vision Ltd.
myRx Refraction Exam (GoEyes app)
myRx Lens Scanner
myRx PD Reader
myRx Acuity Check
94 Yigal Alon, Tel Aviv, Israel
This Privacy Policy describes how we collect, store, use, and disclose personal data (as defined below) about End-Users who use one (or more) of the Solutions detailed above.
Specifically, this Privacy Policy describes our practices regarding:
●    Data Collection & Processing
●    Communications
●    Data Uses
●    Data Security
●    Data Location
●    Data Subject Rights
●    Data Retention
●    Data Controller/Processor
●    Data Disclosure
●    Additional Notices
●    Cookies & Data Collection Technologies
Please read this Privacy Policy carefully and make sure that you fully understand and agree to it. If you do not agree to this Privacy Policy, please discontinue and avoid using our Solutions.
You are not legally required to provide us with any personal data (defined below) and may do so (or avoid doing so) at your own free will. If you do not wish to provide us with your data, or to have it processed by us or any of our services providers, please simply do not enter or interact with our Sites, nor use our Solutions. You may also choose not to provide us with “optional” personal data (when applicable), but please keep in mind that without it we may not be able to provide you with the full range of our Solutions or with the best user experience when using our Solutions.
1. Data Collection & Processing
When we use the term “personal data” in this Privacy Policy, we mean information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, to an individual. It does not include aggregated or deidentified information that is maintained in a form that is not reasonably capable of being associated with or linked to an individual.
Sometimes we collect personal data automatically when an individual interacts with our Solutions and sometimes, we collect personal data directly from an individual. At times, we may collect personal data about an individual from other sources and third parties (such as our Customers and Service Providers), even before our first direct interaction.
The list below describes what categories of personal data we collect or generate about individuals through the Solutions. Some of these categories are processed by the respective Luna Entity as a data processor on behalf of its Customer or business partner. Although we chose to present below all types of data we collect (also in our capacity as a data processor) for the sake of clarity and transparency, this privacy policy only applies to the personal data we collect and process as a data controller. Our data processing role (i.e. controller/processor) with respect to each data category processed is further explained in Section 10 below.
Customer Data
: personal data that we collect and process which relates to our Customer’s representative(s). This includes name, email address, phone number and other contact details.
Account Data:
There are certain Solutions in relation to which we are data controllers (as further detailed in Section 10), in which case we will collect the following data, such as your first and last name, date of birth, address, email, phone number, gender (in relation to the Virtual Try On Product), and other basic contact details, as well as any other personal data you choose to provide when you create an account with a Solution.
Facial Images:
frontal facial pictures (which are shrunk and obfuscated, and therefore do not allow the reidentification of any given individual in any way); and a “Calibration Image” (which is an image with a standard size such as plastic standard magnetic card to set as a reference object). Once the “Calibration Image” is identified within the image you have provided, we make reasonable efforts to apply an obfuscation process to avoid saving any recognizable details that may exist on the card “Calibration Image” on our systems. This “Calibration Image” will not be linked to you or any of your personal data;
Face Measurements
: A capture of your face and scan of your facial geometry, which may include ear junction, eye corner width, face shape, nose bridge height and width and temple length, among other measurements calculated from the face scan. You may decide to consent to the scan, capture, processing, and storage of images of your face to use our Virtual Try On and Face Insights technologies. By clicking to proceed or agreeing to use our technology you consent to a capture of your face. Any such information shall be used by us for the sole purpose of showing virtual eyewear on your face and providing customized information and recommendations about eyewear. We use scans of your facial geometry to show you through our online services how eyewear will look and to ensure the appropriate fit. We may share your measurement information with eyewear providers in order to provide our service and so that any glasses you order fit properly. Your face scans are maintained by us on our systems or those of our service providers, such as web hosting services. Service providers, such as web hosting organizations, may have had access to your facial scans for purposes of providing services to us
Optical Data:
These may include glasses parameters; lens analysis, lens power, eyes’ refraction error, and pupillary distance; your optical prescription; VA results; updated comprehensive eye exam and ID verification (boolean); personal data received through a personal eye health questionnaire; depth data (which is required to measure eyes’ distance and head angle in real-time);
Usage Data
. When you install or use our Solutions, we will automatically collect or generate technical personal data about you. We collect or generate such Usage Data either independently or with the help of third-party services (as detailed in Section 4 below), including through the use of “cookies” and other data collection technologies (as further detailed in Section 5 below). Such Usage Data mainly consists of connectivity, technical and aggregated information, such as IP addresses, session ID, non-identifying data regarding a device (such as device type, screen resolution, etc), operating system, various apps usage statistics, browser version, locale and language settings used, general location (country), date and time stamp, and otherwise data collected by Cookies and other data collection technologies, as further explained in Section 6 below.
Specifically, we collect the following categories of personal data in relation to each Solution. Such data is being collected and processed by the Luna Entity noted in the right column.
Solution
Data Categories
Luna Entity
myRx Refraction Exam (GoEyes app)
Customer Data, Account Data; Optical Data & Usage Data
6over6 Vision Ltd.
myRx PD Reader
Customer Data, Facial Images,  Optical Data (pupillary distance only) & Usage Data
6over6 Vision Ltd.
myRx Lens Scanner
Usage Data & Optical Data
6over6 Vision Ltd.
myRx Acuity Check
Customer Data, Optical Data & Usage Data
6over6 Vision Ltd.
Virtual Try-On
Customer Data, Face Measurements, Optical Data & Usage Data
Ditto Technologies Inc.
2. Data Uses
When we process personal as a data controller (as further explained in Section 10 below), we use it for the following purposes (and in reliance on the legal bases for processing noted next to them, as appropriate):
To facilitate, operate, and provide our Solutions
●
Performance of Contract (to the extent applicable);
●
Legitimate Interest;
●
Explicit Consent (where special categories of personal data are processed);
To gain a better understanding on how individuals use and interact with our Solutions, and how we can improve their and others’ user experience and the value they can generate from using the Solutions, so we could continue improving our products, offerings, and the overall performance of our Solutions
●
Legitimate Interests (improving our services);
To contact our Customers or End-Users with general or personalized service-related messages, as well as promotional messages that may be of specific interest to them where permitted under applicable laws
●
Legitimate Interests (sending service-related messages);
●
Consent (used to sending marketing messages);
To support and enhance our data security measures, including for the purposes of preventing and mitigating the risks of fraud, error, or any illegal, criminal, or prohibited activity
●
Performance of Contract (to the extent applicable);
●
Legitimate Interests (to secure our data and services);
●
Legal Obligation (to implement technical and organizational measures to protect data);
To create aggregated statistical data, inferred non-personal data, or anonymized or pseudonymized data (rendered non-personal and non-identifiable), which we use to improve our Solutions, or for any other purpose
●
Legitimate Interests (to improve our services);
To enforce our
Terms of Use
, to resolve disputes, to carry out our obligations and enforce our rights, and to protect our business interests and the interests and right of third parties
●
Legitimate Interests (dispute resolutions);
To comply with our contractual and legal obligations and requirements, and maintain our compliance with applicable laws, regulations and standards
●
Performance of Contract (to the extent applicable);
●
Legitimate Interest (to maintain compliance);
●
Legal Obligation (to the extent applicable);
To provide our Customers and End-Users with assistance and support, to test and monitor the Solutions, or diagnose or fix technology problems
●
Performance of Contract (to the extent applicable);
●
Legitimate Interests (to ensure the ongoing availability of our services);
To personalize our Solutions, including by recognizing an individual and remembering their information when they return to our Solutions, and to provide further localization and personalization capabilities
●
Performance of Contract (to the extent applicable);
●
Legitimate Interests (to provide a better user experience);
If you are using the Solutions in a territory governed by privacy laws under which “consent” is the only or most appropriate legal basis for the Processing of personal data as described in this Privacy Policy (“
Consent
”), your acceptance of our
Terms of Use
and this Privacy Policy will be deemed as your Consent to the processing of your personal data for all purposes detailed in this Privacy Policy. If you wish to revoke such consent, please contact us at
privacy@luna.io
.
3. Information of a Biometric Nature
Our Virtual Try-On (“VTO”) Solution captures images of your face and scans facial geometry, which may include ear junction, eye corner width, face shape, nose bridge height and width and temple length, among other measurements calculated from the face scan. These data may constitute “biometric identifiers” according to certain State’s laws.
4. Data Location
Your personal data may be maintained, processed and stored by the Luna Entities and their Service Providers (as these terms are defined below in Section 4) in the United States of America, the EEA, Israel and other jurisdictions, as necessary for the proper delivery of our Solutions, for support and maintenance, or as may be required by law.
While privacy laws may vary between jurisdictions, the Luna Entities and their Service Providers are each committed to protect personal data in accordance with this Privacy Policy and customary industry standards, regardless of any lesser legal requirements that may apply in their jurisdiction.
The Luna Entities’ authorized employees may have access to personal data originating from the EU for the purposes of support and maintenance from within the EU and/or Israel, a jurisdiction considered by the European Commission and the UK Secretary of State to be offering an equally adequate level of protection for personal data as is granted in the EU and the UK, respectively. For data transfers from the EEA or UK to countries which are not considered to be offering an adequate level of data protection, we and the relevant data exporters and importers have entered into Standard Contractual Clauses as approved by the European Commission and UK ICO. You can obtain a copy by contacting us as indicated in Section ‎11 below.
5. Data Retention
Data Retention:
We retain personal data for as long as a session has not been completed, and we have not been notified otherwise, or as long as we consider necessary for the purposes described herein.
Additionally, we will also retain personal data for as long as is required in order to comply with our legal and contractual obligations, or to protect ourselves from any potential disputes (i.e. as required by laws applicable to log-keeping, records and bookkeeping, and in order to have proof and evidence concerning our relationship, should any legal issues arise following your discontinuance of use), in accordance with our data retention policy.
Please note that except as required by applicable law, we will not be obligated to retain your personal data for any particular period, and we are free to securely delete it for any reason and at any time, with or without notice to you. If you have any questions about our data retention policy, please contact us at
privacy@luna.io
.
When we process such End-Users’ personal data as a data processor on behalf of a Customer, we will only retain it as instructed by the respective Customer through the Data Processing Addendum we have in place.
6. Data Disclosure
Legal Compliance:
We may disclose or allow government and law enforcement officials access to your personal data, in response to a subpoena, search warrant or court order (or similar requirement), or in compliance with applicable laws and regulations. Such disclosure or access may occur if we believe in good faith that we are legally compelled to do so, or that disclosure is appropriate in connection with efforts to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding actual or suspected illegal activity, fraud, or other wrongdoing.
Service Providers:
We may engage selected Third-Party companies and individuals to perform services complementary to our own (e.g. hosting services, data analytics services, user engagement services, e-mail distribution and monitoring services, and our business, legal and financial advisors) (collectively,
“Service Providers“
). These Service Providers may have access to your personal data, depending on each of their specific roles and purposes in facilitating and enhancing our Solutions, and may only use it for such purposes.
Our Partner ECP (Eye Care Professional):
When you use the myRx Refraction Exam Solution, we will share your Optical Data with our partner ECP in order to provide you with an ECP-approved prescription. Each ECP used by us is authorized to receive your Optical Data and is instructed to process it only in accordance with our instructions.
Business Transactions:
We may share your personal data with an approved business associate only for the purpose of allowing you to make business transactions upon your request (e.g. transferring your eye glasses parameters (using a standard SSL and HTTPS protocols) to an online retailer selected by you, for you to be able to purchase glasses).
Protecting Rights and Safety
: We may share your personal data with others if we believe in good faith that this will help protect the rights, property or personal safety of the Luna Entities, any of our End-Users, Customers or any members of the general public.
The Luna Entities:
We may share personal data internally within our group of companies comprised of the Luna Entities for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy. In addition, should any Luna Entity undergo any change in control, including by means of merger, acquisition or purchase of substantially all of its assets, your personal data may be shared with the parties involved in such event. If we believe that such change in control might materially affect your personal data then stored with us, we will notify you of this event and the choices you may have via e-mail or prominent notice on the respective Solution or via our website at
www.luna.io
.
For the avoidance of doubt, we may share your personal data in additional manners, pursuant to your explicit approval, or if we are legally obligated to do so, or if we have successfully rendered such data non-personal and anonymous. We may transfer, share or otherwise use non-personal data at our sole discretion and without the need for further approval.
7. Cookies & Data Collection Technologies
We and our Service Providers use cookies and other technologies for performance, tracking analytics, and personalization purposes. We may share non-identifiable or aggregated extracts of such information with our partners or Service Providers for our legitimate business purposes.
Cookies are packets of information sent to your web browser and then sent back by the browser each time it accesses the server that sent the cookie. Some cookies are removed when you close your browser session. These are the “Session Cookies.” Some last for longer periods and are called “Persistent Cookies.” We use both types.
To learn more about our cookies and data collection technologies practices, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
8. Communications
Service Communications:
We may contact you with important information regarding our Solutions. For example, we may notify you (through any of the means available to us) of changes or updates to our Solutions, reports, service changes, etc. We may also send you notifications, messages and other updates. Typically, you will not be able to opt-out of receiving such service communications while using our Solutions, as they are integral to such use.
Notifications and Promotional Communications:
We may send you notifications concerning messages and other updates in your account. We may also send you notifications about new features, offerings, events and special opportunities or any other information we think our End-Users will find valuable. We may provide such notices through any of the contact means available to us (e.g. phone, push notifications or e-mail), through the Solutions, or through our marketing campaigns on any other sites or platforms.
If you do not wish to receive such promotional communications, you may notify us at any time by sending an e-mail to
privacy@luna.io
, or by following the “unsubscribe”, “stop”, “opt-out” or “change e-mail preferences” instructions contained in the promotional communications you receive.
9. Data Security
In order to protect your personal data held with us and our Service Providers, we are using industry-standard physical, procedural and electronic security measures, including encryption as appropriate. However, please be aware that regardless of any security measures used, we cannot and do not guarantee the absolute protection and security of any personal data stored with us or with any Third Parties as described in Section 4 above.
10. Data Subject Rights
Individuals have rights concerning their personal data. Please contact us by email at:
privacy@luna.io
if you wish to exercise your privacy rights under any applicable law, including the EU or UK General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) or the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA), such as – to the extent applicable – the right to know/request access to (specific pieces of personal data collected; categories of personal data collected; categories of sources from whom the personal data was collected; purpose of collecting personal data; categories of third parties with whom we have shared personal data), to request rectification or erasure of your personal data held with a Luna Entity, or to restrict or object to such personal data’s processing (including the right to direct us not to sell your personal data to third parties now or in the future), or to port such personal data, or the right to equal services and prices (e.g. freedom from discrimination) (each to the extent available to you under the laws which apply to you). If you are a GDPR-protected individual, you also have the right to lodge a complaint with the relevant supervisory authority in the EU or the UK, as applicable.
Please note that when you ask us to exercise any of your rights under this policy or applicable law, we may need to ask you to provide us certain credentials to make sure that you are who you claim you are, to avoid disclosure to you of personal data related to others and to ask you to provide further information to better understand the nature and scope of data that you request to access. Such additional data will be then retained by us for legal purposes (e.g., as proof of the identity of the person submitting the request). We may redact from the data which we will make available to you, any personal data related to others. If you are a GDPR-protected individual, you also have the right to lodge a complaint with an EU supervisory authority.
11. Data Controller/Processor
Certain data protection laws and regulations, such as the GDPR or the CCPA, typically distinguish between two main roles for parties processing personal data: the “Data Controller” (or under the CCPA the “business”), who determines the purposes and means of processing; and the “Data Processor” (or under the CCPA the “service provider”), who processes the data on behalf of the Data Controller. In the chart below we explain how these roles apply to our Solutions, to the extent that such laws and regulations apply.
Solution
Controller/Processor
Luna Entity
myRx Refraction Exam
Data Controller
of Customer Data, Account Data; Optical Data & Usage Data
6over6 Vision Ltd.
myRx PD Reader
Data Controller
of Customer Data and Usage Data.
Data Processor
of Facial Images, Optical Data & Usage Data
6over6 Vision Ltd.
myRx Lens Scanner
Data Controller
of Usage Data
Data Processor
of Optical Data
6over6 Vision Ltd.
myRx Acuity Check
Data Controller
of Customer Data and Usage Data.
Data Processor
of Optical Data
6over6 Vision Ltd.
Virtual Try-On
Data Controller
of Customer Data and Usage Data.
Data Processor
of Face Measurements and Optical Data.
Ditto Technologies Inc.
When a Luna Entity processes personal data as a data processor (based on the table above) such data is processed on behalf of the respective Luna Entity’s Customer. This means that in such cases the Customer will be the Data Controller of the personal data processed by the Luna Entity, and will reasonably instruct the Luna Entity how to process the data (and for what purposes), subject to our
Terms of Use
, Data Processing Agreement and other commercial agreements with them. This also means that the respective Customer will be solely responsible for meeting any legal requirement (such as establishing a legal basis for processing and responding to Data Subject Rights requests concerning the data they control).
If you are an End-User of any of our Solutions for which we are data processors, please note that we processes your data solely on our Customer’s behalf. Accordingly, if you would like to make any requests or inquiries regarding your personal data we process on our Customer’s behalf
, please contact
such Customer directly
.
For example, if you wish to access, correct, or delete data processed by us on behalf of a Customer, please direct your request to the relevant Customer (who is the “Data Controller” of such data).
Should we receive such requests directly, we will refer them to our Customer.
12. Additional Notices
Updates and Amendments:
We may update and amend this Privacy Policy from time to time by posting an amended version on our Solutions or website at
www.luna.io
. The amended version will be effective as of the date it is so published. We will provide a 10-day prior notice if we believe any substantial changes are involved via any of the communication means available to us or via the Solutions. After such notice period, all amendments shall be deemed accepted by you.
External Links:
While our Solutions may contain links to other websites or services, we are not responsible for their privacy practices, and encourage you to pay attention when you leave our Solutions for the website or application of such third parties and to read the privacy policies of each and every website and service you visit. This Policy applies only to our Solutions.
Children Privacy:
Our Solutions are intended for people over the age of 16. We do not knowingly collect information from children under 16. If we learn that a person under the age of 16 is using the Solutions we will prohibit and block such use and delete any personal data stored with us with regards to such child. If you believe that we might have any such data, please contact us by email at
privacy@luna.io
.
California Requirements
: This Privacy Policy describes the categories of personal information we may collect and the sources of such information (in Section
‎
1 above), and our retention and deletion (Sections
‎
3 and 8) practices. We also included information about how we may process your information (in Sections
‎
2 through
‎
6), which includes for “business purposes” under the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA). We do not “sell” or “share” your personal information for the intents and purposes of CCPA. We may disclose personal data to third parties or allow them to collect personal data from our Solutions as described in Section ‎4 above, if those third parties are authorized Service Providers, Affiliates, or business partners who have agreed to our contractual limitations as to their retention, use, and disclosure of such personal data, or if you integrate the services of third parties with our Solutions, or direct us to disclose your personal data to third parties, or as otherwise described in Section 4 above.
Questions, Concerns or Complaints:
If you have any comments or questions about this Privacy Policy or if you have any concerns regarding your personal data, please contact us by email at
privacy@luna.io
.
EU & UK Representative
: Prighter has been designated as Luna’s representative in the European Union and the UK for data protection matters pursuant to the GDPR or UK GDPR, as applicable. Prighter may be contacted only on matters related to the processing of personal data. To make such an inquiry, please send an email to
privacy@luna.io
or visit
https://prighter.com/q/15084591
.
Data Protection Officer (DPO)
: Luna’s and its Affiliates have appointed
PrivacyTeam
as Data Protection Officer (DPO), for monitoring and advising on ongoing privacy compliance and serving as a point of contact on privacy matters for data subjects and supervisory authorities. If you have any concerns regarding your privacy, or if you wish to make a complaint about how your personal data is being processed, you can contact
dpo@6over6.com
.
We use cookies and other technologies to personalize and enhance your experience on our site. Visit our
privacy policy
to learn more or manage your personal preferences in our
Cookie Consent Tool
. By using our site, you agree to our use of cookies.
Sub-policy 2
https://www.resellerratings.com/terms#privacypolicy:
This website stores cookies on your computer. These cookies are used to improve your website experience and provide more personalized services to you, both on this website and through other media. To find out more about the cookies we use, see our Privacy Policy.
We won't track your information when you visit our site. But in order to comply with your preferences, we'll have to use just one tiny cookie so that you're not asked to make this choice again.
Accept
Decline
Join
Login
Find Stores
Store Categories
Compare Top Stores
Add a Store
Search Stores
A-Z Store Index
Top Reviewers
Community
Trust and Ethics
For Companies
Find Stores
Store Categories
Compare Top Stores
Add a Store
Search Stores
A-Z Store Index
Top Reviewers
Community
Trust and Ethics
Join
Login
For Companies
Terms
Who we Are
Trust
Careers
Terms
Terms
Purchase Terms
Cookie Policy
General Usage Terms
Privacy Policy
ResellerRatings.com
Last updated: May 16
th
2024
Terms and Conditions for Businesses
These business terms and conditions (“
Business Terms
”) apply to individuals or entities (“
Client
” or “
You
”) that contract with RSR to use the Services. These Business Terms are in addition to RSR’s General Terms for Reviewers, Readers, and Users (“
General Terms
”). Capitalized terms used in these Business Terms but not defined herein have the meanings provided in the General Terms.
When RSR and a specific Client execute or “click through” an order form or other similar document initiating the sale or provision of products or services offered by RSR (“
Order Form
”), the Order Form, these Business Terms, the General Terms, RSR’s Privacy Policy, RSR’s Cookies Policies, and any other agreements or documents expressly incorporated by reference form a binding contract between RSR and the Client (“
Agreement
”). In the event of a conflict between any of the documents comprising the Agreement, the Order Form will prevail first, then these Business Terms, and then the General Terms.
The term of the Agreement is set forth in the Order Form. Unless otherwise stated in the applicable Order Form, the Services may be terminated at the end of the applicable term by written notice of either party. RSR shall have the right to terminate the Services at any time (i) upon the material breach of any of the terms of this Agreement without cure within 15 days after receiving notice of breach; or (ii) the insolvency of Client. In the event of termination, all subscription fees for the respective term will be due and payable. Further, access to all review content will be immediately terminated.
RSR will provide Client notice of any updates or changes to the Agreement (“
Contract Updates
”) by posting notice on its website.  Contract Updates will be effective 30 days after posting, unless Client enters into a written agreement with RSR stating otherwise.
During the term of the Agreement, RSR shall provide the products and services that are described in the Order Form (“
Services
”), all subject to and in accordance with the Agreement. To the extent the Services require a license in addition to the license granted to general users in the General Terms, subject to the Agreement, RSR grants Client a limited, non-exclusive, non-transferable, and revocable license to use the Services during the term.
To the extent the Services involve Client importing content, including but not limited to reviews, images, videos, testimonials or other content, from other review sites or any other parties, Client represents that it has the right to import such content and, remains liable for such content and agrees the indemnification provisions contained herein shall apply to any third party claims, including but not limited to third party claims from anyone alleging they are the content owners, related thereto.
Client shall pay the fees, if any, in the amount, at the time, and in the manner set forth in the Order Form. If the Order Form is silent on any applicable payment terms, Client shall perform at the time and in the manner set forth in invoices that RSR may issue from time to time.  In the event Client fails to pay any amounts when due, in addition to any other rights available under applicable law, RSR shall have the right to either (or both) (i) charge interest on the delinquent amount at the rate of eight percent (8%) per annum, or (ii) terminate Client’s access to the Purchased Services.
To the extent the Services involve RSR initiating emails or similar electronic communications to Client’s customers, Client must either (i) expressly obtain the customer’s consent for RSR to contact such customer through Client’s ordering or other process, or (ii) provide written notice of non-consent to RSR and then work with RSR to include a customer “opt in” or consent request in portions of the Services.  In the event that Client initiates emails or similar electronic communications to Client’s customers, it is Client’s responsibility to ensure that all invitations meet all applicable legal and regulatory requirements and Client shall be solely responsible for complying with any applicable laws, including but not limited to privacy, consent, opt-in or opt-out laws.
Client is not required but may from time to time, choose to provide RSR with suggestions, enhancement requests, or other recommendations regarding the Services (“
Feedback
”). Should client provide any such Feedback to RSR, Client grants to RSR a royalty-free, worldwide, transferrable, irrevocable, perpetual license to use of incorporate into the Services any such Feedback. Further, RSR is not required to return or destroy any Feedback provided by Client upon termination of the Agreement.
The fees listed in the Order Form do not include any taxes, levies, duties or similar governmental assessments of any nature, including, for example, value-added, sales, use or withholding taxes, assessable by any jurisdiction whatsoever (collectively, “
Taxes
”). Client shall be responsible for and shall promptly reimburse RSR for the payment of all such Taxes (including interest and penalties) imposed by any governmental authorities based on the Purchased Services, provided that RSR shall be liable for any income taxes on or measured by RSR’s net income or gross receipts.
By using the RSR Services Client gives RSR the right to display Client’s business name and logo on the RSR platform to identify the services or products offered by Client.
If requested by you in writing, RSR may assist you with adding code to your website or with other aspects of implementation to ensure that your systems are compatible with the RSR Services (the “
Implementation Activities
”). To the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, you, on behalf of yourself and your affiliates and agents, hereby expressly waive and release any and all claims, now known or hereafter known, against any of the RSR Parties, on account of any damage, loss, or expense, of any kind or nature, arising out of or attributable to the Implementation Activities, whether arising out of the ordinary negligence of any of the RSR Parties or otherwise. You covenant not to make or bring any such claim against any of the RSR Parties, and forever release and discharge the RSR Parties from liability under such claims.
For a period of thirty (30) days after the termination of any applicable Order Form, Client shall have the right, upon prior written request to RSR, to export any of its Product or Brand Reviews from the Services. Any Product or Brand Reviews exported shall be used for Client’s internal business purposes only. Any other use shall be strictly prohibited.
All confidential information disclosed hereunder will remain the exclusive and confidential property of the disclosing party. The receiving party will not disclose the confidential information of the disclosing party and will use at least the same degree of care, discretion and diligence in protecting the confidential information of the disclosing party as it uses with respect to its own confidential information. The receiving party will limit access to confidential Information to its affiliates, employees and authorized representatives with a need to know and will instruct them to keep such information confidential. RSR may use Client’s confidential information solely as provided for under this Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the receiving party may disclose confidential Information of the disclosing party (a) to the extent necessary to comply with any law, rule, regulation or ruling applicable to it, and (b) as required to respond to any summons, subpoena or in connection with any litigation, provided the receiving party gives the disclosing party prior notice of such compelled disclosure (to the extent legally permitted) and reasonable assistance, at the disclosing party's cost, if the disclosing party wishes to contest the disclosure. Upon the request of the disclosing party, the receiving party will return or destroy all Confidential Information of the disclosing party that is in its possession.
To the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, Client agrees to indemnify and hold harmless RSR, and its affiliates, officers, directors, employees, agents, and representatives of each of them (collectively, the “
RSR Parties
”) from and against any claims, disputes, liabilities, losses, costs and expenses, including, without limitation, reasonable legal fees, in any way related to Client’s access to or use of the RSR Services (including but not limited to review invitations, fake or inappropriate reviews generated by you, any breach of our guidelines and any and all content that you provide) or Client’s breach of this Agreement or any rules, laws or regulations including but not limited to privacy laws.
RSR provides the RSR Services on an “AS IS” basis without warranty of any kind, express or implied. RSR EXPRESSLY DISCLAIMS WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO, ANY IMPLIED WARRANTY OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, OR NON-INFRINGEMENT. RSR is not responsible or liable to Client for any errors, omissions, technical inaccuracies, or downtime in the RSR Services.   RSR is constantly improving the RSR Services and reserves the right to make such improvements or changes without prior notice as it deems appropriate.
TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, CLIENT AGREES THAT RSR SHALL NOT BE LIABLE TO CLIENT OR ANY THIRD PARTY FOR ANY CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES, PUNITIVE DAMAGES, OR SPECIAL DAMAGES (INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION, LOST PROFITS OR LOST DATA), AND, TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, CLIENT WAIVES ANY RIGHT IT WOULD OTHERWISE HAVE TO ANY SUCH DAMAGES. FURTHER, CLIENT AGREES THAT RSR’S MAXIMUM AGGREGATE LIABILITY FOR ALL CLAIMS FROM CLIENT (OR THIRD-PARTIES RELATED TO CLIENT’S USE) IN CONNECTION WITH OR RELATED TO THE RSR SERVICES SHALL BE THE GREATER OF (I) THE FEES PAID BY CLIENT TO RSR OVER THE PRIOR 12 MONTHS OR (II) TWO HUNDRED FIFTY U.S. DOLLARS ($250.00).
All provisions of these Business Terms that should survive termination in order to accomplish their intended purpose shall survive, including, without limitation, Sections 5, 7, 8, 9, 13 and 16.
Cookies Policy
Last updated: Feb 6
th
2020
This Cookies Policy explains what Cookies are and how We use them. You should read this policy so You can understand what type of cookies We use, or the information We collect using Cookies and how that information is used.
Cookies do not typically contain any information that personally identifies a user, but personal information that we store about You may be linked to the information stored in and obtained from Cookies. For further information on how We use, store and keep your personal data secure, see our Privacy Policy.
We do not store sensitive personal information, such as mailing addresses, account passwords, etc. in the Cookies We use.
Definitions
For the purposes of this Cookies Policy, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
Company
(referred to as either "the Company", "We", "Us" or "Our" in this Cookies Policy) refers to, RSR Acquisition, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company.
You
means the individual accessing or using the Website, or a company, or any legal entity on behalf of which such individual is accessing or using the Website, as applicable.
Cookies
means small files that are placed on Your computer, mobile device or any other device by a website, containing details of your browsing history on that website among its many uses.
Website
refers to ResellerRatings, accessible from www.resellerratings.com.
The Use of Cookies
Type of Cookies We Use
Cookies can be "Persistent" or "Session" Cookies. Persistent Cookies remain on your personal computer or mobile device when You go offline, while Session Cookies are deleted as soon as You close your web browser.
We use both session and persistent Cookies for the purposes set out below:
Necessary / Essential Cookies
Type: Session Cookies
Administered by: Us
Purpose: These Cookies are essential to provide You with services available through the Website and to enable You to use some of its features. They help to authenticate users and prevent fraudulent use of user accounts. Without these Cookies, the services that You have asked for cannot be provided, and We only use these Cookies to provide You with those services.
Cookies Policy / Notice Acceptance Cookies
Type: Persistent Cookies
Administered by: Us
Purpose: These Cookies identify if users have accepted the use of cookies on the Website.
Functionality Cookies
Type: Persistent Cookies
Administered by: Us
Purpose: These Cookies allow us to remember choices You make when You use the Website, such as remembering your login details or language preference. The purpose of these Cookies is to provide You with a more personal experience and to avoid You having to re-enter your preferences every time You use the Website.
Tracking and Performance Cookies
Type: Persistent Cookies
Administered by: Third-Parties
Purpose: These Cookies are used to track information about traffic to the Website and how users use the Website. The information gathered via these Cookies may directly or indirectly identify you as an individual visitor. This is because the information collected is typically linked to a pseudonymous identifier associated with the device you use to access the Website. We may also use these Cookies to test new advertisements, pages, features or new functionality of the Website to see how our users react to them.
Targeting and Advertising Cookies
Type: Persistent Cookies
Administered by: Third-Parties
Purpose: These Cookies track your browsing habits to enable Us to show advertising which is more likely to be of interest to You. These Cookies use information about your browsing history to group You with other users who have similar interests. Based on that information, and with Our permission, third party advertisers can place Cookies to enable them to show adverts which We think will be relevant to your interests while You are on third party websites.
Social Media Cookies
Type: Persistent Cookies
Administered by: Third-Parties
Purpose: In addition to Our own Cookies, We may also use various third parties Cookies to report usage statistics of the Website, deliver advertisements on and through the Website, and so on. These Cookies may be used when You share information using a social media networking websites such as Facebook, Instagram, Twitter or Google+.
Your Choices Regarding Cookies
If You prefer to avoid the use of Cookies on the Website, first You must disable the use of Cookies in your browser and then delete the Cookies saved in your browser associated with this website. You may use this option for preventing the use of Cookies at any time.
If You do not accept Our Cookies, You may experience some inconvenience in your use of the Website and some features may not function properly.
If You'd like to delete Cookies or instruct your web browser to delete or refuse Cookies, please visit the help pages of your web browser.
For the Chrome web browser, please visit this page from Google: https://support.google.com/accounts/answer/32050
For the Internet Explorer web browser, please visit this page from Microsoft: http://support.microsoft.com/kb/278835
For the Firefox web browser, please visit this page from Mozilla: https://support.mozilla.org/en-US/kb/delete-cookies-remove-info-websites-stored
For the Safari web browser, please visit this page from Apple: https://support.apple.com/guide/safari/manage-cookies-and-website-data-sfri11471/mac
For any other web browser, please visit your web browser's official web pages.
More Information about Cookies
You can learn more about Cookies at the following third-party website:
Network Advertising Initiative: http://www.networkadvertising.org/
Contact Us
If you have any questions about this Cookies Policy, You can contact us:
By email: support@resellerratings.com
By visiting this page on our website: https://www.resellerratings.com/contact-us
By phone number: tel: +1 216 400 0544
By mail: 812 Huron Rd. E Suite 555 Cleveland, OH 44115
ResellerRatings.com
Last updated: Nov 18
th
2020
General Terms for Reviewers, Readers, and Users
RSR Acquisition, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company with offices at 812 Huron Rd. E Suite 555 Cleveland, OH 44115 RSR (“
RSR
” or “
we
”), solicits, accepts, collects, publishes, and syndicates reviews of various retailers and other organizations, through various products and services such as websites, emails, surveys, and other methods (the “
RSR Services
”). By accessing or using the RSR Services, you (the individual reviewer, reader, or user) agree to these general terms and conditions (“
General Terms
”), and acknowledge the General Terms form a legally binding contract between you and RSR. These General Terms govern your use of the RSR Services.  Please refer to the top of this page for a link to terms that may apply to other uses or apsects of the RSR Services.  Subject to these General Terms, we grant you a limited, non-exclusive, non-transferable, and revocable license to use the RSR Services.
The RSR Services rely on users providing, posting, or submitting various responses, reviews, commentary, and various other forms of feedback or content (“
Feedback
”). You retain ownership and remain responsible for all of your Feedback, including making sure that your Feedback is lawful and appropriate.  While RSR does not assume liability for any of your Feedback, RSR may remove or modify your Feedback at any time without notice if we determine it is unlawful, inappropriate, or otherwise violates applicable policies.  You are solely responsible and liable for your Feedback.  You assume all risks associated with your Feedback.
By providing Feedback through the RSR Services, you grant RSR and its clients, strategic partners, and users a perpetual, non-exclusive, royalty-free, transferable, sublicensable, worldwide license to use, store, display, reproduce, save, modify, create derivative works, transfer, sublicense, perform, and distribute your Feedback for the purpose of providing, running, modifying, adding to, and improving the RSR Services. Without limiting the generality of the license you grant to RSR, you agree that we may use your Feedback in various ways such as reformatting it, incorporating it into advertisements and other works, creating derivative works from it, promoting it, transferring and distributing it, and allowing others to use your Feedback. You irrevocably waive any claims of moral rights or attribution with respect to your Feedback against RSR and its users.
RSR and its clients may publicly display advertisements, paid content, and other information nearby or in association with your Feedback, in any form that RSR deems appropriate. You are not entitled to any compensation for advertisements placed nearby or in association with your Feedback.
RSR may terminate or suspend your access and right to use the RSR Services at any time for any or no reason. The license you grant to RSR is perpetual and does not end if you stop using the RSR Services or if RSR terminates or suspends your access.  All provisions of these General Terms that should survive termination in order to accomplish their intended purpose shall survive, including, without limitation, Sections 6, 7, 10, 11,12, and 14.
Except as authorized in writing by RSR on a case by case basis, you agree that you shall not, directly or indirectly, use any automated means, form of scraping, or data extraction to access or collect RSR data, content, reviews, or other users’ Feedback from the RSR website.
As part of the consideration for the RSR Services, you agree to cooperate in a mutually agreed public testimonial regarding the RSR Services. You understand that such testimonial may be used in connection with publicizing and promoting RSR. You authorize RSR to use your name, image, likeness, voice, and brief biographical information, as may be included in such mutually agreed testimonial.
You agree to receive any legal notices electronically, including via e-mail, posting to our website, or any similar form that we decide to use.
RSR may revise these General Terms from time to time in its sole discretion. We will generally post the most current version of the General Terms on our website.  By continuing to access or use the RSR Services after revisions are posted or become effective, you agree to be bound by the new General Terms. If you don’t agree to the new terms, you must stop using the RSR Services.
To the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, you agree to indemnify and hold harmless RSR, and its affiliates, officers, directors, employees, agents, and representatives of each of them (collectively, the “
RSR Parties
”) from and against any claims, disputes, liabilities, losses, costs and expenses, including, without limitation, reasonable legal fees, in any way related to your access to or use of the RSR Services, your Feedback (including, without limitation, infringement claims), or your breach of any of these General Terms.
RSR provides the RSR Services on an “AS IS” basis without warranty of any kind, express or implied. RSR EXPRESSLY DISCLAIMS WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO, ANY IMPLIED WARRANTY OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, OR NON-INFRINGEMENT. RSR is not responsible or liable to you for any errors, omissions, technical inaccuracies, or downtime in the RSR Services.   RSR is constantly improving the RSR Services and reserves the right to make such improvements or changes without prior notice as it deems appropriate.
TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, YOU AGREE THAT RSR SHALL NOT BE LIABLE TO YOU OR ANY THIRD PARTY FOR ANY CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES, PUNITIVE DAMAGES, OR SPECIAL DAMAGES (INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION, LOST PROFITS OR LOST DATA), AND, TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, YOU WAIVE ANY RIGHT YOU WOULD OTHERWISE HAVE TO ANY SUCH DAMAGES. FURTHER, YOU AGREE THAT RSR’S MAXIMUM AGGREGATE LIABILITY FOR ALL CLAIMS FROM YOU (OR THIRD-PARTIES RELATED TO YOUR USE) IN CONNECTION WITH OR RELATED TO THE RSR SERVICES SHALL BE TWO HUNDRED FIFTY U.S. DOLLARS ($250.00).
RSR respects the legitimate rights of copyright and other intellectual property owners. Pursuant to the Digital Millennium Copyright Act, 17 U.S.C. Section 512 (the “
DMCA
”), RSR designates the agent specified below to receive notifications of claimed copyright infringement on its sites. If you believe that your work has been copied in a way that constitutes copyright infringement or that your intellectual property rights have been otherwise violated, please provide RSR's agent with the following information in accordance with the DMCA: (i) an electronic or physical signature of the person authorized to act on behalf of the owner of the copyright or other intellectual property interest; (ii) a description of the copyrighted work or other intellectual property that you claim has been infringed; (iii) a description of where the material that you claim is infringing is located on any of RSR's Services, with enough detail that we may find it on our website; (iv) your address, telephone number, and email address; (v) a statement by you that you have a good faith belief that the disputed use is not authorized by the copyright or intellectual property owner, its agent, or the law; and (vi) a statement by you, made under penalty of perjury, that the above information in your notice is accurate and that you are the copyright or intellectual property owner or authorized to act on the copyright or intellectual property owner's behalf.
Legal Department
812 Huron Rd. E Suite 555
Cleveland, OH 44115
Telephone: +1 216 400 0544
Email:  support@resellerratings.com
These General Terms shall be governed by the laws of the State of Delaware, without regard for the conflict of laws principles thereof. You agree that in the event a dispute arises concerning your access or use of the RSR Services, or any other program or service offered by RSR, that such dispute shall be resolved exclusively through an arbitration process. Unless the parties specifically agree otherwise in writing, such arbitration shall be settled by binding arbitration in accordance with the commercial arbitration rules of the American Arbitration Association. Further, you agree that any such arbitration shall be settled on an individual basis, and unless the parties agree otherwise in writing shall not be consolidated in any arbitration or suit with any claim or controversy of another party. You agree that all arbitration proceedings will be conducted in Cleveland, OH. You further agree that any interim or preliminary relief sought shall be brought exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction in Cleveland, OH.
No agency, partnership, joint venture, employee/employer or franchiser/franchisee relationship shall be deemed to exist, or is intended to exist, by the General Terms or your access or use of the RSR Services.
These General Terms, and any rights and licenses granted hereunder, may not be transferred or assigned by you, but may be transferred or assigned by RSR without restriction. Any attempted transfer or assignment by you in violation hereof shall be null and void.
These General Terms incorporate by reference and include our Privacy Policy and our Cookies Policy. These General Terms together with the Privacy Policy and Cookies Policy constitutes the entire agreement between you and RSR concerning the RSR Services. If any provision of these General Terms is deemed invalid, then that provision will be limited or eliminated to the minimum extent necessary, and the remaining provisions of these General Terms will remain in full force and effect.
No waiver of any term of these General Terms shall be deemed a further or continuing waiver of such term or any other term, and RSR’s failure to assert any right or provision under these General Terms shall not constitute a waiver of such right or provision.
If requested by you in writing, RSR may assist you with adding code to your website  or  with  other  aspects  of  implementation  to  ensure  that  your  systems  are  compatible  with  the  RSR  Services  (the  “
Implementation Activities
”). To the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, you, on behalf  of  yourself  and  your  affiliates  and  agents,  hereby  expressly  waive and release any and all claims, now known or hereafter known, against any of  the  RSR  Parties,  on  account  of  any  damage,  loss,  or  expense,  of  any kind or nature, arising out of or attributable to the Implementation Activities, whether arising out of the ordinary negligence of any of the RSR Parties or otherwise. You covenant not to make or bring any such claim against any of the RSR Parties, and forever release and discharge the RSR Parties from liability under such claims.
To  the  maximum  extent  permitted  by  applicable  law,  you  shall  defend, indemnify, and hold harmless the RSR Parties against any and all losses, damages,  liabilities,  deficiencies,  claims,  actions,  judgments,  settlements, interest,  awards,  penalties,  fines,  costs,  or  expenses  of  whatever  kind, including reasonable attorneys’ fees and the costs of enforcing any right to indemnification under this Agreement, arising out of or resulting from any claim related to the Implementation Activities, including any claim related to your own negligence or the ordinary negligence of any of the RSR Parties.
Privacy Policy Last Updated: February 7, 2020
ResellerRatings provides this policy to provide you with information relating to how we collect, use and share information. Specifically, this policy addresses:
The
information we
collect
How and when information is used
How we protect your information
Our email programs
Who has access to your information
Third party advertising
How to correct inaccuracies
How
to opt out of email
CCPA
When we set out to make ResellerRatings.com the best shopping experience, we didn't want to settle on a generic one size fits all site. We wanted to build a site that speaks to the best deals and safest shopping experience for you. We respect your privacy, and we do collect data on how you use our site and services in order to tailor it to your needs.
ResellerRatings respects the privacy and security of its users. Our goal is to provide you with a personalized Internet experience that delivers the information, resources, and services that are most relevant and helpful to you. In order to achieve this goal, we sometimes collect information as you interact with our online services to understand what differentiates you from each of our millions of other users.
In order to demonstrate our commitment to your privacy, we have prepared this statement disclosing the privacy practices of RSR Acquisition, LLC for the ResellerRatings business and site. Here, you will learn what personally identifiable information of yours is collected, how and when we might use your information, how we protect your information, who has access to your information, and how you can correct any inaccuracies in the information.
ResellerRatings recognizes that the European Union (“
EU
”) has established strict protections regarding the handling of Personal Data, and ResellerRatings therefore has elected to adhere to the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework (the “
Privacy Shield
”) with respect to such Personal Data that it receives in the United States about individuals located in the EU. ResellerRatings also engages with its Clients in the EU Model Clauses for data processing.
ResellerRatings also recognizes that the State of California has enacted the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“
CCPA
”) which provides California residents with certain protections and rights regarding the handling of Personal Information.  ResellerRatings has adopted an Addendum to this Privacy Policy which addresses the specific California requirements.  The Addendum supplements the provisions of this Privacy Policy.
For further background and information about Privacy Shield, and to see ResellerRatings’s representation on the Privacy Shield List, please refer to the Privacy Shield website at
www.privacyshield.gov
.
If you are located outside of the United States, please be aware that ResellerRatings and/or its Clients may transfer your Personal Data to the United States for processing. By using our website, contracting with us to receive our products or services, or submitting any information to us, you consent to this transfer, processing and storage of your information in the United States, a jurisdiction that may not provide the same level of privacy protection as the laws in your home jurisdiction.
Information Collected
ResellerRatings collects certain information from and about its users in three ways -- directly from the user, from our Web server logs, and with cookies.
User-Supplied Information: When you register on ResellerRatings.com, we may ask you for your name, email address, invoice numbers pertaining to online transactions, and some other personal information. The more accurate information you provide, the better we are able to customize your ResellerRatings.com experience.
Server Log Information: When you visit an Internet Web site, you disclose certain information about yourself, such as your Internet Protocol (IP) address, the time of your visit, and the referring location (e.g., the Site or page that offered a link to a ResellerRatings.com page). ResellerRatings.com, like many other sites, records this basic information about visits to its site.
Cookies: In order to offer and provide a customized, personal service, ResellerRatings.com uses cookies administered by an affiliate of ResellerRatings, to store and help track your information as you travel throughout the site. For example, we may use cookies to help remind us who you are and to deliver content and services based upon your account information. In addition, third party advertising networks may issue cookies when serving advertisements. Cookies are simply pieces of information that are sent to your browser from a Web server and stored on your computer's hard drive. The use of cookies is relatively standard and you will likely find them used on most other major Web sites. Most browsers are initially set up to accept cookies. If you prefer, you can reset your browser either to notify you when you receive a cookie, or to refuse to accept cookies. You should understand that certain areas of many sites may not function properly if you set up your browser to not accept cookies or if you reject a cookie. Merchants signing up for our services should also recognize that by displaying the ResellerRatings seals and/or widgets on their respective Web properties, merchants, on behalf of themselves and their users, authorize ResellerRatings and its affiliates to place cookies on browsers visiting the merchant-operated sites.
You should remember that whenever you voluntarily disclose personal information online, such as in message boards, through e-mail, discussion groups, or in chat areas, your information can be collected and used by others. Although ResellerRatings tries to protect your personal information, ResellerRatings cannot ensure or warrant the security of any information you transmit to us, and you do so at your own risk. You are also solely responsible for maintaining the secrecy of any passwords you set up and/or any account information. Most of the data we collect is anonymous, but some of our Clients may direct us to ask for your contact information, which is Personal Data. Wherever we obtain access to Personal Data about our Clients’ customers or website visitors, we are acting as a mere data processor on behalf of our Clients, and we therefore process such Personal Data strictly in accordance with their instructions and pursuant to our contractual arrangements with them. ResellerRatings’s Clients are the data controllers and data owners. If you are a customer or website visitor with an existing relationship with one of our Clients, you should refer to the Client’s website to understand the privacy practices that apply to Personal Data that we may maintain about you on behalf of the Client. Our Clients are encouraged to participate in privacy initiatives to protect the privacy and security of the data collected; however, since we do not have direct control over the policies or practices of our Clients, we cannot be responsible for their actions. If you are a reviewer who provides information to ResellerRatings via the ResellerRatings site or portal, all content and personal data that you provide remains your property, and ResellerRatings acts as the data controller for all legal purposes. Although our Client is licensed to use the content provided by a reviewer, such license is not perpetual and expires a commercially reasonable time after you, the reviewer, remove or delete the content from ResellerRatings. You have the right to access your Personal Data. If you would like to access and review Personal Data that you provided to us, you can contact us at Privacy@resellerratings.com. We will cooperate as appropriate with requests from reviewers within 30 days.
How and When Information is Used
We use information in different ways to give you the best experience.
User-supplied information:
This information is used for purposes such as personalization and verification.
Web Server Logs:
This information helps us identify which areas of our site are of interest to our visitors. ResellerRatings also collects the Internet Protocol (IP) addresses of its visitors for the purposes of system administration and to report aggregate information to our advertisers.
Cookies:
We use cookies to let users use our services more easily and to let us keep track of certain statistical information that helps us improve our site and offerings available by our affiliates. Cookies also allow us to save passwords and preferences for you so that you won't have to re-enter them the next time you visit.
Your Email Address:
We use your email address to send you information about your ResellerRatings.com account, such as your username and password, and confirmations of reviews that you have submitted to the site. From time to time, we may email you to let you know about new site features no more frequently than once per month but generally only a few times per year. Except as described in this Privacy Policy, your email address is never sold or otherwise provided to a 3rd party.
Invoice Numbers:
When you submit a review of an online merchant to ResellerRatings, we ask you to provide an invoice number for your transaction with that merchant as evidence that you did indeed enter into a transaction with that merchant. Merchants have the ability to login to ResellerRatings.com to view invoice numbers submitted to our site by their customers for any given review of that merchant. Therefore, any invoice number that you submit to our website is visible to the merchant to whom your review pertains, but not to any other merchants or users of our website.
How We Protect Your Information
The privacy and protection of your personal information is important to us. ResellerRatings does not make personally identifiable information available to any third parties without your permission or as otherwise described in this Privacy Policy. Any user statistics that we may provide to prospective advertisers or partners regarding your ResellerRatings.com usage are provided on an anonymous basis only and do not include any personally identifiable information about any individual user.
Your access to some services and content is password protected. We recommend that you do not divulge your password to anyone. ResellerRatings will never ask you for your password in an unsolicited phone call or in an unsolicited email. You should not disclose your user name and password to others. In addition, if applicable, you should remember to sign out of your ResellerRatings.com account or service at the end of each session. You may also wish to close your browser window when you have finished your work. This is to ensure that others cannot access your personal information and correspondence if you share a computer with someone else or are using a computer in a public place like a library or Internet cafe.
Unfortunately, no data transmission over the Internet can be guaranteed to be 100% secure. Accordingly, despite our efforts to protect your personal information, ResellerRatings cannot ensure or warrant the security of any information you transmit to us, or to or from our online products or services. You transmit all such information to us at your own risk. However, once we receive your transmission, we make our best effort to ensure its security on our systems.
Children
In most cases, ResellerRatings’s services and website are not designed or intended for use by children under 18, although our Clients may offer children’s products for purchase by adults and/or children’s services. If you are under 18, you should not use our site without the permission and in the presence of a parent or guardian. In rare instances, a ResellerRatings’s Client may choose to survey children under 18; such surveys will not solicit Personal Data. Children under 18 may not submit any Personal Data to us, and if we discover that we have inadvertently gathered any Personal Data about a child under 18, we will take appropriate steps to delete it immediately.
Our Email Programs
ResellerRatings sends the following types of emails to our users:
New user registrations:
When you sign up for a free account at ResellerRatings.com, either to write a review or to participate in our discussion forums, we send you a verification email containing a link. Click the link to verify and activate your account. Once activated, this email is no longer sent to you. You may receive more than one activation email reminder, but an opt-out link is provided at the bottom of these activation emails.
Deal Newsletter:
You can choose to receive daily deals newsletters containing product specials found at various retailers. To receive this newsletter, you must opt in by inputting your email address into a form on our homepage. Then, you will receive a verification email to confirm that you want to receive the newsletter. Every newsletter that is sent out also includes an unsubscribe link at the bottom.
Review Alerts:
If you are an online retailer, you can sign up to be notified by email when reviewers post reviews to our site about your company. You can turn these email alerts on and off in the merchant administration panel that we provide to you.
When you write a review for a merchant listed at ResellerRatings.com, that merchant can post a public response in reply to your review. You will be emailed a copy of the merchant's response. Additionally, the merchant can contact you via our site, to send you an email via a web form. Your email address is not revealed to the merchant. If you wish to opt out of these types of emails, use the unsubscribe link at the bottom of each email.
Exit Survey Reminders:
Many Internet retailers participate in our exit survey program, which displays a popup window to the user after the user completes a purchase at the retailer's website. The exit survey window asks the user if they want to write a review of the retailer, and to enter their email address, if so. Then, one week later, we send a reminder email to the user, asking them to complete a review. Only one reminder email is sent, as part of this program, per the user's initial request.
Who Has Access to the Information
Except as described in this Privacy Policy, ResellerRatings and its affiliates will not willfully disclose any individually identifiable information that has been collected about users to any third party without first receiving that user's permission, other than to provide its services. Personal information you include as part of your public user profile and other personal information you post on or through the ResellerRatings.com service as part of reviews is made publicly available and so can be accessed by nearly anyone who views your profile or reviews online. This includes your username, the biographical information and photos you include in your profile, and any personal information you may include in your postings of comments and reviews. ResellerRatings may disclose personal information when we believe in good faith that the law requires it or to protect the rights or property of ResellerRatings. ResellerRatings will use its best efforts to contact you if ResellerRatings.com is issued a subpoena or other legal process that requests your identity.
ResellerRatings may disclose personal information to affiliates or to third party vendors, consultants, and other service providers who are working on our behalf. Also, your personal information may be disclosed or transferred to one or more third parties in connection with, or during negotiations of, any merger, sale of company assets, financing, restructuring or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to or by another company. When you are at the ResellerRatings.com site and asked for personal information, you share that information with ResellerRatings (or to affiliates and/or vendors providing services on behalf of ResellerRatings.com) alone, unless the service is offered in conjunction with another party. For example, some ResellerRatings services are offered in conjunction with another company. In order to provide such co-branded services to you, it is necessary for us to share your personal information with the company offering the co-branded service. If you do not want your data to be shared, you can choose not to allow the transfer of data by not using that particular service. If you choose to share your data with a provider of a co-branded service, you should understand that those providers may have separate privacy and data collection practices. ResellerRatings has no control over and accepts no liability for these independent practices. Each provider should provide more information regarding its privacy and/or use policies.
Third Party Advertising
We use Google and other third-party advertising companies to serve ads when you visit our site. These companies may use information about your visits to this and other sites in order to provide advertisements on this site, other sites, and other interactive media about goods and services that may be of interest to you. Third party advertising companies may issue cookies when serving advertisements. This Privacy Policy does not apply to, and we are not responsible for, third party cookies or other tracking technologies, and we encourage you to check the privacy policies of these third parties to learn more about their privacy practices. If you would like to obtain an opt-out cookie from Google or other third-party advertising companies, or for more information about targeted advertising in connection with ad networks, please visit www.networkadvertising.org/managing/opt_out.asp. Having an opt-out cookie means that the information collected from your website visits will not be used to target ads to you. You may have to obtain a new opt-out cookie for each browser you use and whenever you reset your cookies.
How to Correct Inaccuracies
If you use another ResellerRatings.com service, we may send you a confirmation e-mail confirming your new account and/or service. The message will be sent to the address that you supplied us and will describe ways for you to change or delete the account information provided. Remember to keep the confirmation e-mail as it will also contain information that will help you in case you run into problems accessing our services. We welcome any questions or comments you have about ResellerRatings.
Updates to this Privacy Policy
We may make changes to this Privacy Policy from time to time. If we update this Privacy Policy, we will update the “
last updated
” date at the top of this Privacy Policy. Any changes to this Privacy Policy are effective upon posting. In the event of any material changes to this Privacy Policy, we will use reasonable efforts to notify you of the change.
Opt Out of Email
We will occasionally send you information on ResellerRatings products or services we think may be of interest to you if you are a Client or choose to sign up for our newsletter. If you do not want to receive this promotional information, you may opt-out from these types of communications by following the instructions included in each communication, or by contacting us at Privacy@resellerratings.com. To stop receiving any kind of emails from ResellerRatings, contact us and provide your email address.
Our mailing address to contact us:
C/O RSR Acquisition, LLC
812 Huron Rd. E Suite 555
Cleveland, OH 44115
Or faster yet,
contact us
here support@resellerratings.com
ResellerRatings and Privacy Shield
This Privacy Statement covers the website
www.resellerratings.com
, all ResellerRatings’s hosted surveys, including the collection of Personal Data about ResellerRatings’s Clients and ResellerRatings’s Clients’ customers and website and mobile website visitors.
If you have questions or complaints regarding our Privacy Statement or practices, please contact us at Privacy@resellerratings.com. If you are not satisfied with our response and have a complaint about our privacy practices, you can contact your local Data Protection Authority.
ResellerRatings may be required to disclose Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements. ResellerRatings may be liable for passing Personal Data on to third-parties (an “
onward transfer
”) that do not adhere to the protections mandated by the EU and Switzerland.
Dispute Resolution
ResellerRatings participates in the Privacy Shield Framework. As part of our participation in that program, we have agreed to adhere to its principles for the resolution of disputes relating to our compliance with Privacy Shield. If you have any complaints regarding our compliance with Privacy Shield, you should first contact us (as provided above). If contacting us does not resolve your complaint, you may raise your complaint with your local Data Protection Authority in accordance with the Privacy Shield Framework guidance published here:
https://ec.europa.eu/commission/index_en
ResellerRatings is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the United States Federal Trade Commission and other regulatory agencies. In some circumstances, an individual having a dispute with ResellerRatings may invoke binding arbitration through the Privacy Shield Panel in accordance with the Privacy Shield Framework guidance published here:
http://ec.europa.eu/justice/data-protection/document/citizens-guide_en.pdf
IF YOU ARE A CALIFORNIA RESIDENT PLEASE CONTINUE TO READ BELOW FOR AN EXPLANATION OF ADDITIONAL RIGHTS WHICH YOU MAY HAVE
Privacy Notice/Addendum for California Residents
Effective Date:
February 7, 2020
This
Privacy Notice/Addendum for California Residents
supplements the information contained in ResellerRatings’s Privacy Policy
https://www.resellerratings.com/terms#privacypolicy
and applies solely to all visitors, users, and others who reside in the State of California ("
consumers
" or "
you
"). We adopt this notice to comply with the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“
CCPA
”) and any terms defined in the CCPA have the same meaning when used in this Notice.
Where noted in this Notice, the CCPA temporarily exempts personal information reflecting a written or verbal business-to-business communication ("
B2B personal information
") from some its requirements.
Information We Collect
We collect information that identifies, relates to, describes, references, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer, household, or device ("
personal information
"). Personal information does not include:
Publicly available information from government records.
Deidentified or aggregated consumer information.
Information excluded from the CCPA's scope, like:
health or medical information covered by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) and the California Confidentiality of Medical Information Act (CMIA) or clinical trial data;
personal information covered by certain sector-specific privacy laws, including the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA), the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (GLBA) or California Financial Information Privacy Act (FIPA), and the Driver's Privacy Protection Act of 1994.
In particular, we have collected the following categories of personal information from its consumers within the last twelve (12) months:
Category
Examples
Collected
A. Identifiers.
A real name, alias, postal address, unique personal identifier, online identifier, Internet Protocol address, email address, account name, Social Security number, driver's license number, passport number, or other similar identifiers.
YES
B. Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e)).
A name, signature, Social Security number, physical characteristics or description, address, telephone number, passport number, driver's license or state identification card number, insurance policy number, education, employment, employment history, bank account number, credit card number, debit card number, or any other financial information, medical information, or health insurance information.
Some personal information included in this category may overlap with other categories.
YES
C. Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law.
Age (40 years or older), race, color, ancestry, national origin, citizenship, religion or creed, marital status, medical condition, physical or mental disability, sex (including gender, gender identity, gender expression, pregnancy or childbirth and related medical conditions), sexual orientation, veteran or military status, genetic information (including familial genetic information).
NO
D. Commercial information.
Records of personal property, products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies.
NO
E. Biometric information.
Genetic, physiological, behavioral, and biological characteristics, or activity patterns used to extract a template or other identifier or identifying information, such as, fingerprints, faceprints, and voiceprints, iris or retina scans, keystroke, gait, or other physical patterns, and sleep, health, or exercise data.
NO
F. Internet or other similar network activity.
Browsing history, search history, information on a consumer's interaction with a website, application, or advertisement.
YES
G. Geolocation data.
Physical location or movements.
YES
H. Sensory data.
Audio, electronic, visual, thermal, olfactory, or similar information.
NO
I. Professional or employment-related information.
Current or past job history or performance evaluations.
NO
J. Non-public education information (per the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Section 1232g, 34 C.F.R. Part 99)).
Education records directly related to a student maintained by an educational institution or party acting on its behalf, such as grades, transcripts, class lists, student schedules, student identification codes, student financial information, or student disciplinary records.
NO
K. Inferences drawn from other personal information.
Profile reflecting a person's preferences, characteristics, psychological trends, predispositions, behavior, attitudes, intelligence, abilities, and aptitudes.
YES
We obtain the categories of personal information listed above from the following categories of sources:
Directly from you. For example, from forms you complete or products and services you purchase.
Indirectly from you. For example, from observing your actions on our Website.
From retailers who you may have purchased products or services from.
Use of Personal Information
We may use, sell, or disclose the personal information we collect for one or more of the following purposes:
To fulfill or meet the reason you provided the information. For example, if you share your name and contact information to request a price quote or ask a question about our products or services, we will use that personal information to respond to your inquiry. If you provide your personal information to purchase a product or service, we will use that information to process your payment and facilitate delivery. We may also save your information to facilitate new product orders or process returns.
To provide, support, personalize, and develop our Website, products, and services.
To create, maintain, customize, and secure your account with us.
To process your requests, purchases, transactions, and payments and prevent transactional fraud.
To provide you with support and to respond to your inquiries, including to investigate and address your concerns and monitor and improve our responses.
To personalize your Website experience and to deliver content and product and service offerings relevant to your interests, including targeted offers and ads through our Website, third-party sites, and via email or text message (with your consent, where required by law).
To help maintain the safety, security, and integrity of our Website, products and services, databases and other technology assets, and business.
For testing, research, analysis, and product development, including to develop and improve our Website, products, and services.
To respond to law enforcement requests and as required by applicable law, court order, or governmental regulations.
As described to you when collecting your personal information or as otherwise set forth in the CCPA.
To evaluate or conduct a merger, divestiture, restructuring, reorganization, dissolution, or other sale or transfer of some or all of our assets, whether as a going concern or as part of bankruptcy, liquidation, or similar proceeding, in which personal information held by us about our Website users/consumers is among the assets transferred.
We will not collect additional categories of personal information or use the personal information we collected for materially different, unrelated, or incompatible purposes without providing you notice.
Sharing Personal Information
We may disclose your personal information to a third party for a business purpose or sell your personal information, subject to your right to opt-out of those sales (see Personal Information Sales Opt-Out and Opt-In Rights). When we disclose personal information for a business purpose, we enter a contract that describes the purpose and requires the recipient to both keep that personal information confidential and not use it for any purpose except performing the contract. The CCPA prohibits third parties who purchase the personal information we hold from reselling it unless you have received explicit notice and an opportunity to opt-out of further sales.
We may share your personal information with the following categories of third parties:
Service providers.
Data aggregators.
Data syndicators.
Disclosures of Personal Information for a Business Purpose
In the preceding twelve (12) months, Company has not disclosed personal information for a business purpose.
Sales of Personal Information
In the preceding twelve (12) months, Company has sold the following categories of personal information:
Identifiers.
Internet or other similar network activity.
Geolocation data.
We sell your personal information to the following categories of third parties:
Data aggregators.
Data syndicators.
Your Rights and Choices
The CCPA provides consumers (California residents) with specific rights regarding their personal information. This section describes your CCPA rights and explains how to exercise those rights.
Access to Specific Information and Data Portability Rights
You have the right to request that we disclose certain information to you about our collection and use of your personal information over the past 12 months. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request (see Exercising Access, Data Portability, and Deletion Rights), we will disclose to you:
The categories of personal information we collected about you.
The categories of sources for the personal information we collected about you.
Our business or commercial purpose for collecting or selling that personal information.
The categories of third parties with whom we share that personal information.
The specific pieces of personal information we collected about you (also called a data portability request).
If we sold or disclosed your personal information for a business purpose, two separate lists disclosing:
sales, identifying the personal information categories that each category of recipient purchased; and
disclosures for a business purpose, identifying the personal information categories that each category of recipient obtained.
Deletion Request Rights
You have the right to request that we delete any of your personal information that we collected from you and retained, subject to certain exceptions. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable consumer request (see Exercising Access, Data Portability, and Deletion Rights), we will delete (and direct our service providers to delete) your personal information from our records, unless an exception applies.
We may deny your deletion request if retaining the information is necessary for us or our service provider(s) to:
Complete the transaction for which we collected the personal information, provide a good or service that you requested, take actions reasonably anticipated within the context of our ongoing business relationship with you, fulfill the terms of a written warranty or product recall conducted in accordance with federal law, or otherwise perform our contract with you.
Detect security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, or prosecute those responsible for such activities.
Debug products to identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality.
Exercise free speech, ensure the right of another consumer to exercise their free speech rights, or exercise another right provided for by law.
Comply with the California Electronic Communications Privacy Act (Cal. Penal Code § 1546
seq.
).
Engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific, historical, or statistical research in the public interest that adheres to all other applicable ethics and privacy laws, when the information's deletion may likely render impossible or seriously impair the research's achievement, if you previously provided informed consent.
Enable solely internal uses that are reasonably aligned with consumer expectations based on your relationship with us.
Comply with a legal obligation.
Make other internal and lawful uses of that information that are compatible with the context in which you provided it.
Exercising Access, Data Portability, and Deletion Rights
To exercise the access, data portability, and deletion rights described above, please submit a verifiable consumer request to us by either:
Calling us +1 216 400 0544
Emailing us at support@resellerratings.com
Visiting https://www.resellerratings.com/contact-us and/or https://www.resellerratings.com/privacy/manage
Only you, or someone legally authorized to act on your behalf, may make a verifiable consumer request related to your personal information. You may also make a verifiable consumer request on behalf of your minor child.
You may only make a verifiable consumer request for access or data portability twice within a 12-month period. The verifiable consumer request must:
Provide sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected personal information or an authorized representative, which may include:
Full Name and Email Address
Describe your request with sufficient detail that allows us to properly understand, evaluate, and respond to it.
We cannot respond to your request or provide you with personal information if we cannot verify your identity or authority to make the request and confirm the personal information relates to you.
Making a verifiable consumer request does not require you to create an account with us. However, we do consider requests made through your password protected account sufficiently verified when the request relates to personal information associated with that specific account.
We will only use personal information provided in a verifiable consumer request to verify the requestor's identity or authority to make the request.
For instructions on exercising sale opt-out rights, see Personal Information Sales Opt-Out and Opt-In Rights.
Response Timing and Format
We endeavor to respond to a verifiable consumer request within forty-five (45) days of its receipt. If we require more time (up to 90 days), we will inform you of the reason and extension period in writing.
If you have an account with us, we will deliver our written response to that account. If you do not have an account with us, we will deliver our written response by mail or electronically, at your option.
Any disclosures we provide will only cover the 12-month period preceding the verifiable consumer request's receipt. The response we provide will also explain the reasons we cannot comply with a request, if applicable. For data portability requests, we will select a format to provide your personal information that is readily useable and should allow you to transmit the information from one entity to another entity without hindrance.
We do not charge a fee to process or respond to your verifiable consumer request unless it is excessive, repetitive, or manifestly unfounded. If we determine that the request warrants a fee, we will tell you why we made that decision and provide you with a cost estimate before completing your request.
Personal Information Sales Opt-Out and Opt-In Rights
If you are 16 years of age or older, you have the right to direct us to not sell your personal information at any time (the "
right to opt-out
"). We do not sell the personal information of consumers we actually know are less than 16 years of age, unless we receive affirmative authorization (the "
right to opt-in
") from either the consumer who is at least 13 but not yet 16 years of age, or the parent or guardian of a consumer less than 13 years of age. Consumers who opt-in to personal information sales may opt-out of future sales at any time.
To exercise the right to opt-out, you (or your authorized representative) may submit a request to us by visiting the following Internet Web page link:
https://www.resellerratings.com/privacy/manage
Once you make an opt-out request, we will wait at least twelve (12) months before asking you to reauthorize personal information sales. However, you may change your mind and opt back in to personal information sales at any time by:
http://www.resellerratings.com/signup
You do not need to create an account with us to exercise your opt-out rights. We will only use personal information provided in an opt-out request to review and comply with the request.
Non-Discrimination
We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of your CCPA rights. Unless permitted by the CCPA, we will not:
Deny you goods or services.
Charge you different prices or rates for goods or services, including through granting discounts or other benefits, or imposing penalties.
Provide you a different level or quality of goods or services.
Suggest that you may receive a different price or rate for goods or services or a different level or quality of goods or services.
However, we may offer you certain financial incentives permitted by the CCPA that can result in different prices, rates, or quality levels. Any CCPA-permitted financial incentive we offer will reasonably relate to your personal information's value and contain written terms that describe the program's material aspects. Participation in a financial incentive program requires your prior opt in consent, which you may revoke at any time.
Changes to Our Privacy Notice
We reserve the right to amend this privacy notice at our discretion and at any time. When we make changes to this privacy notice, we will post the updated notice on the Website and update the notice's effective date.
Your continued use of our Website following the posting of changes constitutes your acceptance of such changes
.
Contact Information
If you have any questions or comments about this notice, the ways in which ResellerRatings collects and uses your information described here and in the Privacy Policy, your choices and rights regarding such use, or wish to exercise your rights under California law, please do not hesitate to contact us at:
Phone
: +1 216 400 0544
Website
: https://www.resellerratings.com/contact-us
Email
: Privacy@resellerratings.com
Postal Address
: 812 Huron Rd. E Suite 555,
Cleveland, OH 44115
Have any questions?
Contact Us »
Sub-policy 3
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 4
https://globalprivacycontrol.org/#about:
GPC signal not detected.
Please
download a browser/extension
that supports it.
Take control of your privacy.
Online privacy should be accessible to everyone. It starts with a simpler way to exercise your rights.
Get Started
Get Involved
Read the Latest Press Release
and
Follow @globalprivctrl on Twitter
.
Turn On
GPC
Enable Global Privacy Control to communicate your privacy preference.
Send the Signal
Your browser will send the
GPC
signal to websites you visit.
Exercise Your Rights
Participating websites can respect your privacy rights accordingly.
You may have noticed “Do Not Sell” and “Object To Processing” links around the web from companies complying with privacy regulations. To opt out of websites selling or sharing your personal information, you need to click these links for every site you visit.
Now you can exercise your legal privacy rights in one step via Global Privacy Control (
GPC
), required under the California Consumer Protection Act (CCPA).
Together, over a dozen organizations are developing the
GPC
specification.
Get Involved
GPC
lets users signal their desired privacy, just by browsing.
GPC
is available as part of several major browsers, extensions, and websites.
View Full Spec
Test against the reference server
The
GPC
signal will be intended to communicate a Do Not Sell request from a global privacy control, as per
CCPA-REGULATIONS §999.315
for that browser or device, or, if known, the consumer. Under the GDPR, the intent of the
GPC
signal is to convey a general request that data controllers limit the sale or sharing of the user’s personal data to other data controllers (
GDPR Articles 7 & 21
). Over time, the
GPC
signal may be intended to communicate rights in other jurisdictions.
“
CA DOJ is encouraged to see the technology community developing a global privacy control in furtherance of the CCPA and consumer privacy rights.
”
Xavier Becerra
CA Attorney General
“
40 million consumers are now using web browsers and other privacy tools that support this global opt out. Major publishers, the New York Times, Washington Post, have already pledged to respect it. California's Attorney General has already said that companies must respect GPC. This is a big step in Americans privacy, a big, big step forward.
”
Ron Wyden
Senate Finance Chairman
“
My hope is that Governor Northam and the legislature will improve [the newly passed Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act] in the near future in important ways... making it easier for Virginia citizens to invoke their privacy rights, such as through a global privacy control.
”
Mark R. Warner
VA Senator
“
GPC provides a clear and binary indication of an individual's choice... Based on a review of several of the web browsers' intentions regarding GPC, it appears likely to be a prominent, easily understandable, and accessible mechanism in the browser settings.
”
Alexander McD White
Bermuda Privacy Commissioner
“
It's past time to give consumers a real and enforceable way to stop companies from tracking and selling their data. My Mind Your Own Business Act would do just that, and this project [Global Privacy Control] shows it’s possible.
”
Ron Wyden
Senate Finance Chairman
“
CCPA requires businesses to treat a user-enabled global privacy control as a legally valid consumer request to opt out of the sale of their data. CCPA opened the door to developing a technical standard, like the GPC, which satisfies this legal requirement & protects privacy.
”
Xavier Becerra
CA Attorney General
Got to slide
0
Got to slide
1
Got to slide
2
Got to slide
3
Got to slide
4
Got to slide
5
Join over 50 million users.
Download a supported browser or extension and start exercising your privacy rights with GPC.
View All Downloads
Abine DeleteMe
LEARN MORE
about
Abine DeleteMe
Brave Browser
LEARN MORE
about
Brave Browser
Disconnect
LEARN MORE
about
Disconnect
DuckDuckGo Privacy Browser
LEARN MORE
about
DuckDuckGo Privacy Browser
Firefox
LEARN MORE
about
Firefox
OptMeowt by privacy-tech-lab
LEARN MORE
about
OptMeowt by privacy-tech-lab
Privacy Badger by EFF
LEARN MORE
about
Privacy Badger by EFF
lockrMail by lockr
LEARN MORE
about
lockrMail by lockr
Founding Organizations
The following organizations, representing 50 million users and hundreds of thousands of websites, are in support of GPC.
View All Organizations
Featured Press & Announcements
GPC Privacy Browser Signal Now Used by Millions and Honored By Major Publishers
Global Privacy Control
Your browser can tell websites how to treat your data. But companies didn’t have to listen — until now
The Washington Post
‘Do Not Track’ Is Back, and This Time It Might Work
Wired
Tech-publisher coalition backs new push for browser-level privacy controls
TechCrunch
View More Press
Frequently Asked Questions
Global Privacy Control (GPC) is a proposed specification designed to allow
Internet users to notify businesses of their privacy preferences, such as
whether or not they want their personal information to be sold or shared. It
consists of a setting or extension in the user’s browser or mobile device and
acts as a mechanism that websites can use to indicate they support the
specification.
GPC is being developed by a broad coalition of stakeholders:
technologists, web publishers, technology companies,
browser vendors, extension developers, academics, and
civil rights organizations.
The GPC was initially spearheaded by
Ashkan
Soltani
Georgetown
Law
and
Sebastian
Zimmeck
(
Wesleyan
University
) in collaboration with
The New York
Times
,
The Washington
Post
,
Financial Times
,
Automattic (Wordpress.com & Tumblr)
,
Glitch
,
DuckDuckGo
,
Brave
,
Mozilla
,
Disconnect
,
Abine
,
Digital Content Next (DCN)
,
Consumer
Reports
, and the
Electronic Frontier Foundation (EFF)
.
GPC is available for an increasing number of browsers and browser extensions,
listed
here
. If you want to use
GPC, you can download and enable it via a participating browser or browser
extension. More information about downloading GPC is available
here
.
The GPC spec is easy to implement on a wide variety of websites and other
services. The proposed specification and back-end implementation reference
documentation are available
here
.
For additional information, please feel free to reach out on Github or Twitter
(
@globablprivctrl
).
As it is intended to invoke users’ privacy rights, we encourage policymakers
from around the world to engage in the development of this specification. If you
would like to learn more about how GPC could work in your jurisdiction, please
contact us via email at
info[at]globalprivacycontrol.org
.
GPC was initially introduced at the World Wide Web Consortium (W3C)
Privacy
Community Group
(Privacy CG) in April 2020. A
number of stakeholders are part of that community. There are ongoing
discussions in the Privacy CG. Interested parties are encouraged to engage with
the proposal
here
.
Additionally, GPC is currently being implemented across the web. A number of
browsers, extensions, and publishers are supporting or implementing GPC (see
below).
View All
FAQ
s
Get Involved
Contact us to learn more about supporting
GPC
in your browser, app, or website.
@globalprivctrl